Authors
Peter Reiher
Number of Reviews
25

Title
Review for Talvisota (1989)
[This is not intended as a review, in the usual sense.  Consider it a sample of
the sort of thing that I think would be interesting to see in a newsgroup like
rec.arts.cinema.]
     War movies used to be a staple of American and international film.  They
provided an excellent mechanism for combining action with patriotism, which fed
the studios' wallets and the immigrant studio heads' nationalism at the same
time.  But war movies died with Vietnam, in the U.S., at least.  The only war
movies one sees today are anti-war movies -- an excellent mechanism for
combining action with idealism, which feeds the studios' wallets and the
shallow studio heads' superficial sense of social involvement at the same time.
(Things change, but not much.)  Anti-war movies have a much more limited
audience, though, so not nearly so many of them are made.  Which makes the
chances of seeing three new war movies in a single month rather unlikely.
     None the less, I did.  It helped that two were made outside the U.S.  What
is interesting about the experience is that the films covered three different
wars from three different periods of history, using three different
perspectives, and had three different themes.  The up side of the decline of
war movies is that they are no longer out there glamorizing war.  The down side
is that war is a powerful catalyst for the artistic impulse, and has been a
fundamental component in many great artistic masterpieces.  These three films
found three different ways to use the power of war without glorifying it.
     HENRY V is an adaptation of Shakespeare's play about Britain's great
warrior king, the victor of Agincourt.  During World War II, Olivier used this
material to fashion propaganda, creating a world of pageantry in which plucky
little England overcame tremendous odds to gloriously win a continental war.
The new version of the film, directed by Kenneth Branagh, takes a very
different view of things.  The same play, edited differently by the two
directors, provided two different views of war.  Branagh presents a dynamic
young king prodded and duped into fighting a bloody, vicious war whose victory
is undone within a generation.  This HENRY V contains no fields of honor and
thundering hoards of glistening knights.  It is full of dirt, mud, and gloom.
Despite a decisive victory with small losses, Branagh's Henry is a king who has
seen the horror of war, and is happy to compromise his demands to avoid a
return to battle.  England is a nation led by a duped leader into an
unnecessary and horrible war to uphold a dubious territorial claim.  War here
is futile, nasty, without any redeeming value.
     Branagh furthers his achievement, though, by presenting the seductive side
of war.  Henry is a tremendous leader of men, able to stir and cajole them to
unbelievable efforts.  How many in the audience would not follow Henry into
battle after the speech he gives before Agincourt?  Precious few, I think.
Yet, while that battle was forced, it was fought in a war that would benefit
only the few, if anyone at all.
     GLORY is a very different film.  GLORY, directed by Edward Zweig, tells
the story of the first black regiment to see combat in the American Civil War.
During that War, one of whose major causes was slavery in the Southern states,
the Union was reluctant to use black soldiers.  Underlying prejudice against
blacks was nearly as widespread and deep in the North as in the South.
Moreover, the South made it very clear that they intended to treat black
soldiers and those who fought with them very harshly.  So, despite the intense
desire of blacks to participate in the war that would liberate them, the Union
dragged its heels on using them.
     But the persistence of blacks and the enlightenment of a few white
Northerners finally prevailed.  Black soldiers were recruited, trained, and,
eventually, used in battle.  GLORY tells the true story of the first regiment
of black soldiers to see battle.  Their bravery in some hideously deadly combat
proved that black soldiers could be just as effective as whites.  Unlike HENRY
V, the war in GLORY is necessary, and, in a destructive way, liberating.  The
soldiers in GLORY die in enormous numbers, but they die for a reason, and their
deaths have meaning and value.  The horror of war is not minimized, but the
focus of the film is how some men used war for good purposes, sacrificing
themselves for the benefit of others.  Not a popular point of view, nowadays,
and only the socially acceptable message of racial equality made this film
possible, at all.
     TALVISOTA, the third film, has a more modern setting, and is primarily
concerned with the destruction of war.  In 1939, the U.S.S.R. invaded Finland
with a huge army, basically seeking to incorporate it into the Soviet Union,
or, at least, to seize strategically important chunks of the country.  But the
Soviets made two important errors -- they invaded in winter, and they
underestimated the resolve of the Finns.  Unprepared for a winter campaign
against a determined opponent, the Russians took tremendous losses, despite
equally tremendous numerical superiority, and the war was eventually ended.
Finland had to give up some territory, but maintained its independence.
     The few Americans who know of this war tend to view it as a dashing affair
carried out on sparkling snow, with daring Finnish ski troops encircling
lumbering, incompetent Soviet units.  It has a clean, surgical image,
reinforced by clear heros and villains, and a situation in which the underdog
basically prevailed.  TALVISOTA smashes that image.  A Finnish film directed by
Pekka Parikan, it does not suggest that the Finns were responsible or in the
wrong, but it makes clear that no modern war has anything of glamour about it.
     TALVISOTA follows a group of Finns who are conscripted to help defend the
country.  Their war is not a matter of swooping down on bumbling Russians, but
a horror of trench fighting against seemingly endless hoards of enemy troops,
with intermittent moments of terror as Soviet artillery and aircraft pound
them.  One after another, they die, suddenly, nastily, usually with no
particular rhyme or reason.  Charging into the enemy sometimes proves safer
than going behind a tree to relieve yourself.  The soldier next to you can be
blown apart while you aren't scratched.  Every time a man goes out of your
sight, it might be the last time you ever see him.
     No film I have seen has ever painted as strong a picture of the
destructive power of war as does TALVISOTA.  The film is three harrowing hours
of death and explosion.  Forests are reduced to fields of shattered stumps.
Men are ground down to the point where they are hardly living at all.  Death is
rarely clean, and usually very messy and unpleasant.  The soldiers are killed,
their families are torn apart, the countryside is destroyed.  And, worst of
all, the whole awful process is unavoidable.  Finland didn't want the war,
didn't ask for the war, but could only avoid it by submitting entirely to the
enemy.  TALVISOTA is easily the bleakest of the three films, for it shows no
redeeming feature of war, yet also suggests that the best intentions in the
world cannot always allow you to avoid it.
     These three films demonstrate the artistic power of war.  How could an
activity that, by its nature, involves death on a large scale and the clash of
fundamental ideals not be a powerful subject for art?  The true shame of most
war films made during the greatest flood of combat movies is perhaps not that
they made war too heroic, but that they treated the subject so shallowly, with
Errol Flynn and company mowing down faceless battalions of Japanese and
Germans, at no real cost to themselves or even to the enemy.  Toy soldiers fell
over, and our side won the game.  Branagh, Zweig, and Parikan have artistic
visions -- war as horrible waste, war as a terrible but necessary step in
liberation, war as tragically unavoidable destruction.  These sorts of war
films are important even in times of peace, and even to those who oppose war
for any purpose.  They are the cinema's contribution to one of the great issues
of all times, and are every bit as important as books, editorials, and
speeches.  This is cinema as art.

Title
Review for Godfather: Part III, The (1990)
     I finally got around to seeing THE GODFATHER PART III, and I'm not
happy.  It's is much, much worse than the first two films.  And "worse"
is the term, not "not as good."  I thought the first two films were
brilliant, while the third is easily the worst film Coppola has ever
made, even counting that trivial little segment of NEW YORK STORIES.
The only good points of this film, in my opinion, were Andy Garcia's
dynamic performance, good production design, and an acceptable
performance from Pacino.
     The flaws, on the other hand, are legion, starting, as bad films
invariably do, with the script.  THE GODFATHER PART III is not nearly as
well written as the first two films.  The dialog is weaker, the story is
not well integrated into the world built in the first two films, some of
the characters are inconsistently written, few of them are very
interesting.  Some characters only seem present because they were in the
other films, notably Kay, Diane Keaton's character.  
     One very serious problem in the script is that we do not get enough
explanation of why Michael isn't the man he was at the end of the last
film.  Hints, yes, but not a real explanation.  Since the whole series
is more about him than anyone else, that's a major flaw.  More or less
the last thing we see in THE GODFATHER PART II is Michael contemplating
the murder of his brother, and coming to terms with it by banishing all
his feelings.  In this film, his son tells him that he is leaving law
school to become a singer, and Michael gives the same song and dance
that a stockbroker would give his son in the same circumstances.  There
is no trace of the powerful, amoral man who would do anything to get his
way in this scene.  Where'd he go?  Either Michael should continue to
behave in the same way, or we must be told what caused him to change.
In this film, Kay tells Michael that she thinks he's more  dangerous
than ever now that he's respectable.  Why?  He seems far less dangerous
in this film.  Is Kay supposed to be wrong?  Is it supposed to be a
foreshadowing of an explosion of violence and evil from Michael?  There
is no support for either of these possibilities, or any other that I can
see, except, perhaps, that Coppola and Puzo thought it was a good line.
     The script is also lacking in the atmosphere and strongly written
scenes that were so much a part of the earlier films.  The opera
sequence at the end of the film is an inferior retread of the climax to
THE COTTON CLUB.  There is no scene in this film equal (in its writing)
to the scene in THE GODFATHER PART II where Hagen explains to one of the
family's betrayers why he must commit suicide, or the scene where
Michael tells his brother that he knows of his betrayal, or the scene in
Part I where the Godfather dispenses favors at his daughter's wedding.
The script also provided too little material for us to get any feel for
the world of the Mafia, as the first two scripts did so  well.  It
didn't substitute any feel for the world of high finance, or the
Vatican, either.
     Talia Shire's character is especially harmed by this failure of
background.  She is forever going on about "saving the family."  What
family?  There's Pacino, Garcia, Pacino's two children, herself, and
about three underlings.  Pacino's kids don't want to have anything to do
with the Mafia, so who are they saving the family for?  Contrast this to
the first film, in which Brando was surrounded by sons, cousins, and
retainers -- in a true, if perverse, sense, he was a feudal lord who
watched out for all of the peasants in his barony.  In this film, Pacino
is a businessman with only a shell of a company.
     The acting is surprisingly poor.  As mentioned, Andy Garcia is
dynamic and alive, and Pacino is fine, given the scripted limitations.
But the rest of the cast contains hardly a decent performance, much less
a brilliant one.  Eli Wallach left tooth marks all over the scenery.
Joe Mantegna gave the first bad performance I've ever seen from him.
(He was, admittedly, hampered by some of the script's poorest lines.)
George Hamilton had nothing to do and did it drably.  Talia Shire
careened between different interpretations of her character which mostly
didn't fit in with what we already know of her from the  earlier films.
There isn't a single bad performance in either of the first two films,
and there are several in this one.  Disturbingly, the minor characters,
who seemed so flavorful in the first two films, dissolve into
indistinguishable mush in this film -- a combined flaw in writing and
casting.  As far as Sofia Coppola goes, well, let's just say I
considered the climax of the opera scene to be a happy ending.
     In addition to problems of script and acting, THE GODFATHER PART
III is perhaps the worst edited major film I've seen in many years,
probably a result of the rush job necessary to meet the December 25th
deadline.  THE GODFATHER PART III is choppy.  Scenes do not flow
naturally together.  Coppola intercuts between simultaneous action
without rhyme or reason.  A notable example -- the scene in which Andy
Garcia is playing pool and is interrupted by Talia Shire.  This scene is
unnecessarily cut in half by a sequence in which Michael Corleone 
masquerades as Kay's driver so he can show her Sicily.  Why the cut?
Well, Garcia has a reaction to the car starting up and driving away,
and, unless the other scene is interposed, the reaction makes no sense.
However, the interruption robs Garcia's scene of the power it needs.
With sufficient time, I'm sure the editors could have worked around the
problem, possibly cutting Garcia's reaction and placing the scene
between Michael and Kay elsewhere.  That's the sort of thing that
happens when you have a rush job.  There are other examples, as well.
     A more serious flaw is the frequent use of fades to black.  At
least four or five times, a scene ends, we fade to black, and we are
somewhere else dealing with entirely different thematic material.  These
fades cause the rhythm of the film to stop dead.  Using a fade to black
as a period at the end of a cinematic sentence is a perfectly valid
technique, if you really do want to pause and indicate that a major
change is about to take place, but that isn't what the makers of this
film seem to have in mind.  Rather, they need to end one scene and start
another, and they didn't have time to do anything good, so they faded to
black.  Whenever they do, any momentum the film has built disappears,
and they do it quite a lot.
     The music for this film, another strong point in the earlier films,
is terrible.  Coppola's hiring his father to do the score was an even
worse idea than hiring his daughter to play a leading role.  The only
decent parts of the score are those written by Nino Rota for the first
film.  Much of the rest of the music is banal, and sometimes
inappropriate.
     And even the direction is poor.  I mean, really, a spinning
newspaper stopping to reveal a headline?  Followed by a shot of
newspapers coming off the presses so we could see another headline?
These were cliches in the 1940's.  Relying on them to provide us with
information is almost cynically lazy.  I never thought Coppola would try
to use this kind of technique seriously.  This one is so old that it
isn't even any use for a joke.
     Coppola also seems to have lost his eye for shots.  I liked very
much a shot showing Raf Vallone and Pacino separated by an urn, during
Pacino's confession.  It nicely commented on the content of the scene,
with the physical separation between the calm, peaceful cardinal and the
suffering, troubled Mafioso.  But that is the only memorable scene,
other than, possible, dropping one of the murder victims down a
stairwell and the opening sequence in which the camera travels over the
wreckage of the Corleone's vacation house by the lake.  That very
promising opening suggests that we will see the corresponding moral ruin
of the man who owns the house.  But we don't.  Instead, we get a kinder,
gentler Michael Corleone who, for reasons unclear from anything we've
seen in the earlier films, decides he wants to get out of the crime
business.  
     The laziness of the direction is also clear in all of the film's
other flaws, including the acting and the editing.  Particularly
ludicrous is the scene at the very end, in which the aged Michael dies
in his chair in a long shot.  He drops the orange, slumps over, he's
dead -- so far, so good.  Then he falls out of the chair.  I was
reminded of the guy on LAUGH IN who used to ride around on a tricycle
and then fall over sideways.  Not very subtle, Coppola.
     The photography isn't bad, but lacks the rich texture of the first
two films.  Shadows played a much more important role in those films.
Here, not very much happens in shadow.  The light isn't as golden,
perhaps appropriate for a film with a more modern setting, but
definitely not as pretty.
     The production design is as luxurious as ever, and cannot be
faulted.  It's nice, I guess, that someone in the production is doing
his job.
     Overall, I'm not sure whether I regard THE GODFATHER PART III as a
major disappointment or not.  I was always somewhat dubious about the
promise of the film, particularly since Coppola did it for the money,
not because he really wanted to show us more.  The mixed reviews led me
to believe that the film might contain something of value, but I was
wrong.  If you feel that you must be a completist about this series, I
guess you should see THE GODFATHER PART III.  But if you are looking for
entertainment in a film, or artistic quality, look somewhere else.
There's actually some justice to the fact that HOME ALONE will probably
gross two to three times as much as this film.

Title
Review for Saigon: Year of the Cat (1983) (TV)
The following review is of a film appearing at the recent AFI Film Festival
in Los Angeles.  I have no way of knowing whether the film reviewed will
appear at any normal theaters any time in the near future (or even at all).
     Some people seem to be tired of Vietnam War movies already, but, in
actuality, that subject contains a rich vein of artistic material that remains
untapped.  Just because we've seen several movies on what it was like to be a
foot soldier in the U.S. Army in Vietnam during the late 1960's doesn't mean
that all that should be said has been said.
     On the other hand, just because a film happens to view the Vietnam War
from a new, or even a worthy, angle doesn't mean that everyone should go out
and see it.  SAIGON--YEAR OF THE CAT is a case in point.  No other Vietnam War
movie has really looked at what happened when South Vietnam began to collapse
(unless you count BRADDOCK: MISSING IN ACTION III, and let's not).  And, as
parts of SAIGON--YEAR OF THE CAT demonstrate, it's a fascinating subject, full
of rich thematic material, drama, and irony.  But SAIGON--YEAR OF THE CAT blows
its opportunity by relying on a trite foreground story, while relegating all of
the interesting stuff to the background.  Not surprisingly, it doesn't work too
well.
     SAIGON--YEAR OF THE CAT opens with credits and an introductory title card
that seem straight out of the fifties -- mysterious Asia, high adventure, all
that rousing imperialist nonsense.  Immediately it settles down to its real
business, more respectable but less entertaining.  What the film really wants
us to do is follow a rather dull middle-aged British bank officer.  The only
interesting thing about her life is that she is about to have an affair with a
CIA agent, and the only interesting parts of the film are those that abandon
her and follow the agent.  If writer David Hare and director Stephen Frears had
been willing to jettison this boring narrator they might have had something.
Alternately, they could have made some attempt to make her an interesting
person.   They did neither, and her effect on the film is soporific.
     Fortunately, halfway through the film she's almost forgotten.  The North
Vietnamese are on the move, the South is cracking up, the American ambassador
is living in a fantasy, all the Vietnamese who cooperated with the Americans
are beginning to panic, and the CIA agent (surprisingly more hero than villain)
fears that his country will put things off too long and leave all their friends
to the mercy of the Communists.  This section of the film has tension, energy,
and intelligence.  If the whole film had been built around this conflict, the
film would have been very fine indeed.
     But SAIGON--YEAR OF THE CAT is a British film, not an American one.  An
obvious characteristic of almost all American films is that they are about
Americans -- the main characters are Americans, and the focus of the film is
almost always on their concerns.  (Only certain historical films, and some
non-Hollywood independent films, seem able to break through this myopia.)
Similarly, this British film seems compelled to insert a British observer,
though she is totally out of place and completely peripheral to the film's
interests.  Now I have some idea of how Indonesians must feel when they see THE
YEAR OF LIVING DANGEROUSLY, or the French when they see FRANTIC, or Chileans
when they see MISSING.
     A strong performance might have overcome poor writing in this central
character, but Judi Dench plays the part as if she was tired of the role before
she even started it.  She shows no energy, and fails to make the audience see
why it should care about her life.  Contrasting that is the fine performance
Frederick Forrest gives as the reluctant CIA agent.  He seems to be attempting
something of a Bogart tribute, and his is certainly the sort of part Bogart
excelled in.  Forrest makes the picture live whenever he's on the screen,
provided Dench is not.  She is able to throw a bucket of cold water even on his
performance.  Josef Somer adds another bad CIA man performance to his record,
E.G.  Marshall is convincingly deluded as the U.S.  ambassador, and Wallace
Shawn is, as so often, dispensable.  Roger Rees has a brief part in which he
tries his best to convince us that he's crazy over Dench.  He had much better
luck with Nicholas Nickleby.
     Stephen Frears doesn't really have much of a feel for this kind of
material.  He's better off working with more fully developed characters, in a
script about people, rather than events.  MY BEAUTIFUL LAUNDRETTE showed his
talents to much better advantage than SAIGON--YEAR OF THE CAT does.  Still, he
does get into the spirit of the thing once Saigon really begins to fall apart,
and he stages some very memorable scenes in the U.S.  Embassy, as the last
Americans are pulling out in panic.  His cinematographer, Jim Howlett, abets
him in this well, and also gives Forrest's performance a lift by cleverly using
shadows on his face to suggest the darkness and secrecy of Forrest's world.
     David Hare's script is the big problem.  Even at the film's best, the
story never seems very well organized, and the central construction of the
script works to weaken the film.  As in the adaptation of his play, PLENTY,
Hare focuses on an unlikeable heroine.  In this film, though, the heroine is
not only unlikeable, but also tedious.  In addition, the script assures a slow
start, since nothing really happens until an hour into the film.  Hare's dialog
is nothing special, either, which is quite disappointing from an
internationally known playwright.
     SAIGON--YEAR OF THE CAT actually predates the recent rash of American
Vietnam movies, having been shot in the mid-80's.  Predating the wave isn't
going to make any difference to American distributors or American audiences,
though, and SAIGON--YEAR OF THE CAT is not terribly likely to find favor with
either.  Half a good movie isn't enough for most people, and that's what
SAIGON--YEAR OF THE CAT has to offer.

Title
Review for Mistero di Oberwald, Il (1980)
The following review is of a film appearing at the recent AFI Film Festival
in Los Angeles.  I have no way of knowing whether the film reviewed will
appear at any normal theaters any time in the near future (or even at all).
     In scientific research, the researcher's ideal is the experiment in which
all but one variable is controlled.  In such an experiment, varying the single
parameter can tell the researcher the precise results of changes, small or
large.  Artists, on the other hand, tend to experiment with abandon,
introducing a multitude of factors.  The effects of any given part of an
artistic experiment become clear only after many experiments include it, so
that experience about the results can be validated.  Michelangelo Antonioni,
one of the bolder cinematic experimenters of the 1960's, however, has chosen a
more scientific method in THE OBERWALD MYSTERY.  He presents a film that is
utterly conventional in all ways -- except one.
     THE OBERWALD MYSTERY is based on a play by Jean Cocteau.  The story
concerns a queen of an unspecified Middle European country who retired into
solitude following the assassination of her husband.  An encounter with another
assassin forces the queen to re-examine her choice, and accept responsibility
for her country's fate.  The story, faithfully followed by Antonioni and his
co-screenwriter, Tonino Guerra, is a sub-standard piece of early twentieth
century intellectual claptrap.  Antonioni and Guerra even preserve such
stagebound devices as the opening scene between two minor characters who
explain the background of the plot, shabbily concealed behind a relationship
that proves of no importance whatsoever to the story.  The play (called THE
EAGLE HAS TWO HEADS) was obviously not Cocteau's finest hour.
     Similarly, acting, editing, and score have no surprises.  Monica Vitti
gives a dull, respectable performance as the queen, and the supporting cast
goes through the motions in a manner familiar to anyone who has seen many old
Hollywood melodramas.  The editing is professional, but unexciting.  The music
is culled from classics by Strauss, Schoenberg, and Brahms, and is used in the
most conventional ways.  Were this the entire story, THE OBERWALD MYSTERY would
be a bafflingly stodgy addition to Antonioni's credits, doubly baffling as
Antonioni has never done anything so obvious and old-fashioned before.
     But there is one unique element -- the cinematography, or, perhaps more
accurately, the videophotography.  Even here, much is standard, and reminiscent
of the work of the untalented.  The camera is permitted no interesting angles
or movements.  (Well, almost none.  A director with as instinctive an eye as
Antonioni's is hard-put to eliminate every shred of interest from his
camerawork.)  The only innovation is in the use of color and video special
effects.
     Antonioni and cinematographer Luciano Tovoli shot THE OBERWALD MYSTERY on
videotape.  They then performed odd permutations on the video image for three
years, and transferred the results to film.  Actors are bathed in colored
lights suggestive of moods and motives.  Ghostly figures appear and disappear,
obedient to the characters' memories.  Backgrounds fade and are replaced with
images suitable to the feeling of the scene.  It's all quite peculiar.
     And, alas, ineffective.  Some experiments, unfortunately, are failures.
THE OBERWALD MYSTERY must count as one such.  The coloring of the characters is
more silly than artistically satisfying, especially the blue filtering
perpetually placed over the villainous head of the government's secret police.
The ghostly images are puzzling.  The switch of backgrounds is sometimes too
subtle to be effective, otherwise too obvious in its intentions.  Moreover, the
visual quality of videotape is too poor to stand up to a 35mm blowup.  The
color, when not washed out with Antonioni's little experiments, is garish; at
its best, it suggests a rather faded print of a Roger Corman Poe movie.  Sudden
movements cause easily visible breakup of the image into scan lines.  And, as
usual, video lends a flat, boring texture to almost any scene.
     Antonioni might simply be ahead of his time in the use of videotape.  For
some years, Hollywood filmmakers have been talking about high-definition
videotape, and extolling its virtues.  (Most of which have to do with the ease
of editing.)  The results have not been too impressive, so far.  The special
effects Antonioni incorporates through the use of special video processing
machines are no great shakes.  Selective tinting of scenes has been around
since the silents.  It wasn't a very effective technique then, being the poor
man's color film, and it shows little potential for ever being any more
effective.  Superposition of images is a well-developed technology for film,
and the video version shown off in THE OBERWALD MYSTERY is not nearly as good
as mediocre film work in this area.  And that's about it for Antonioni's bag of
video tricks.
     As an experiment, THE OBERWALD MYSTERY has some interest for those few who
care about the technology of filmmaking and the future of video.  The mere fact
that such a prominent European filmmaker would spend so much time and effort on
video has to be of some interest, in and of itself.  However, beyond this small
band, and the equally small band of Antonioni completists, THE OBERWALD MYSTERY
has little to offer.  Its tired story and run-of-the-mill production provide
little entertainment value.  Its intellectual underpinnings are musty.
Antonioni has put all his efforts into playing with one variable, leaving the
rest untouched.  It's a pity that he didn't set those other variables to more
interesting values.

Title
Review for Raising Arizona (1987)
     I was a big fan of Joel and Ethan Coen's first film, "Blood Simple."  I'm
not sure if it's accurate to say that their new film, "Raising Arizona," is
precisely a disappointment, but it certainly isn't at all what I expected, and
I didn't really like it.  "Raising Arizona" is such a peculiar movie that I
find it difficult to analyze my own feelings about it.  In some sense, that
itself is a sort of recommendation, since I'm a believer in trying to have
unusual film experiences, but I can't help but come back to the fact that I
didn't really like it.
     The story is moderately peculiar, to begin with.  A lower class Arizona
couple discover that they can't have a baby.  Adoption is out, as the husband
is a five or six time loser, specializing in robbing convenience stores with an
unloaded gun.  When they hear of the birth of a set of quintuplets, they set
out to steal one of them for their own.  "Raising Arizona" just starts from
here, throwing in vast numbers of complicating factors and extraneous
vignettes.  It's safe to say that the screenplay is rather different from the
run-of-the-mill Hollywood script, or any other type of script that actually
gets made.
     The Coen brothers (who wrote the script, and then split directing and
producing chores, Joel doing the former, Ethan the latter) have taken this odd
substrate and layered on further levels of weirdness.  The characters are
strange, the direction is unusual, the cinematography gratuitously inventive,
and the overall effect more stupefying than anything else.  I'm not really sure
if "Raising Arizona" came out the way the Coen brothers intended, but it
certainly doesn't work.  Perhaps the plan was to create an overall atmosphere
so bizarre as to carry the film on that basis alone.  Unfortunately, the
different elements tend to work against each other, rather than demonstrating
the internal consistency necessary to carry such a plan off.
     Not to say that "Raising Arizona" is without its merits.  There are
several funny moments, a nicely choreographed chase scene, and Nicholas Cage,
playing the husband (known as H.I., pronounced just as you would expect), gives
an excellent performance.  His character is a dimwitted rube who's not very
strong on honesty, but Cage makes him lovable, rather like a large, stupid dog
whose misdeeds are so inept as to make you feel sorry for him.  Cage's greatest
achievement is that he makes H.I.  seem like a real person, a feat beyond the
rest of the cast.  Everyone else is a caricature, and somehow "Raising Arizona"
needed more of a foot in the real world.  More realistic portrayals might have
overcome the sense that the Coens view not just these characters, but the whole
level of society they represent, with condescension and contempt.
     Particularly unfortunate is Holly Hunter's shrill and shallow performance
as the wife.  If both of the leading characters had been real people, then
supporting them with a cast of stick figures might have worked out.  But Hunter
brings very little to her part, other than a few good line readings.  In
particular, she doesn't show a strong enough maternal instinct to convince us
of the necessity of all the random mayhem that follows.  Randall "Tex" Cobb
stands out among the supporting cast, as an extremely nasty bounty hunter.  And
the babies (of course) are very cute.
     The cinematography, by Barry Sonnenfield, is breathtaking, yet
inappropriate.  In "Blood Simple," every flashy camera move reinforced the
scene.  Here, the wild antics of the camera seem beside the point, as if they
were created almost without regard for what is going on in the film.  They are
worth seeing simply because they're so audacious, but they add little to the
film.  Carter Burwell's music, on the other hand, does seem to capture some of
the tone that the film strives for.
     If there's one thing wrong with "Raising Arizona," it's a lack of
sympathy.  The Coens don't seem to care about any of their characters, except
as the butts of jokes.  Really effective slapstick depends on the audience
caring about the disaster befalling the characters, but if the filmmakers don't
care about them, the audience won't , either.  The Coens made "Raising Arizona"
with too much brains, and too little heart.  "Blood Simple" was all thought and
no emotion, too, but the thriller genre is inherently more cerebral than
comedy.  Good comedy comes from the gut and the heart, only secondarily from
the brain.
     Given its immense uncertainty of tone, I'd have to rate "Raising Arizona"
as a failure, overall.  But it is a very different type of failure than the
typical film.  "Raising Arizona" is an imaginative failure, a failure caused by
an attempt to do more than the filmmakers were able to do.  That may not be the
same thing as success, but it's more interesting than some films that achieve
everything they set out to do.  For those looking for something different than
the average film, "Raising Arizona" is worth seeing.

Title
Review for Living Daylights, The (1987)
     The bi-annual Bond film has appeared again, and, thankfully, it's a great
improvement on the last few.  THE LIVING DAYLIGHTS is the best Bond film since
FOR YOUR EYES ONLY, and, before that, one would have to go all the way back to
the Sean Connery films to find its equal.  Albert Broccoli and John Glen have
revitalized the Bond formula by refusing to continue the game of self-one-
upsmanship that had reduced the series to near-farce.  Instead, they have
returned to the strengths of the first few films--semi-believable plots,
reliance on Bond rather than on special effects, and a serious tone lightened
by occasional humor, rather than self-parody occasionally flirting with
reality.
     The major reason for this return to the old ways is the new James Bond,
Timothy Dalton.  Dalton is probably closer to the Bond created by Ian Fleming
than any of his predecessors.  He not only makes the action believable (which
Roger Moore rarely did), and projects the debonair attitude that is so vital to
the Bond mystique, but he also manages to show some of the tension underneath.
Roger Moore's went through some of the most hideous ordeals without ever
showing any sign that he was deeply affected by them.  Perhaps a slight
expression of concern when the going got particularly rough, and a minute
suggestion of relief when he escaped an unusually fiendish trap, but, after
that, the experience was completely behind him, and as good as forgotten.
Moore's Bond had no more history than the typical figure in a video arcade 
game, and rather less than some of those.
     Dalton, on the other hand, shows that being an undercover agent isn't all
a bed of roses.  His is the first on-screen Bond who gives any hint that the
character could flirt on the edge of a nervous breakdown.  Not to say that he
doesn't show suitable aplomb in the face of danger, but you can't help but feel
that it all *does* mean something to him, and isn't just a game that he knows
he's destined to win.
     The newly serious character is backed by a much more plausible plot than
is typically used in a Bond film.  For the first time in quite a while, one
might actually have the film spoiled by hearing too much about the plot.
Suffice it to say that it borders on the credible, and is not nearly as
cataclysmic as A VIEW TO A KILL or THE SPY WHO LOVED ME.  Richard Maibaum
(whose association with Bond films goes all the way back to DR. NO) and
Michael G. Wilson, who wrote the script, provide Bond with a nice selection of
witty lines and neat gadgets, again not as broad as in the recent films.  Bond
jokes when it's appropriate, but the jokes fit within the story.  One joke is
even thrown away, going almost unnoticed by the audience, thereby making the
point that we are watching James Bond relieving the tension with a quip, rather
than Timothy Dalton straining for a few cheap yocks.
     Director John Glen started off as a second unit director, specializing in
action sequences, before graduating to the full directing duties.  Glen has
directed all of the Bond films since FOR YOUR EYES ONLY (not counting NEVER SAY
NEVER AGAIN, of course).  He's done a particularly good job with THE LIVING
DAYLIGHTS, especially with the action sequences.  Glen seems to have been
inspired here more by the Indiana Jones school of stunt and action work than by
the previous Bond films.  He tends to have the danger and intensity build,
trying hard to give a sense of true risk, rather than merely dazzle us with the
technical brilliance of a stunt.  The opening sequence keynotes this change:
instead of something like a plane flying vertically through a closing hanger
door, or having Bond parachute off a glacier, THE LIVING DAYLIGHTS opens with a
sequence relying primarily on that oldest of action settings, a car chase.
Skillful editing and direction make it far more exciting than the earlier
stunts, which tended to provoke applause rather than tension.  Glen and company
follow through with this approach throughout.
     As has been the tendency in the last few Bond films, a fair number of well
known actors show up in supporting roles.  John Rhys-Davies appears as a
Russian general, Joe Don Baker has an unexpectedly small role as an arms
dealer, and Art Malik finally shows up as an Afghan rebel.  All do what is
expected of them, without any flashes of brilliance.  Jeroen Krabbe, as another
Russian general, does perhaps a little too much of what is expected of him.
Maryam d'Abo joins the list of unknown actresses who have played female leads
in Bond films.  She's beautiful, and responds well to menace, but doesn't seem
likely to have a brilliant future.  Several of the usual supporting players
show up, doing what they usually do.  
     The technical work on THE LIVING DAYLIGHTS is a demonstration of state-of-
the-craft, rather than state-of-the-art.  All areas demonstrate a high degree
of professionalism, without ever moving beyond into innovation.  Maurice
Binder's credits are a particularly weak effort by him, and the title song is
one of the worst ever written for a Bond film.  The rest of the John Barry 
score is a serviceable one, but breaks no new ground.
     THE LIVING DAYLIGHTS should appeal strongly to those who have spent years
yearning for the Bond of yore.  People who actually liked Roger Moore's Bond
(and there must be a lot of them, considering how much money his films made)
will probably be disappointed that THE LIVING DAYLIGHTS isn't that sort of film
at all.  It is a bit long, and would probably have played better ten minutes
shorter, and Dalton doesn't seem to have completely settled into the role.  On
the whole, though, THE LIVING DAYLIGHTS is an encouraging addition to the Bond
series.

Title
Review for Christopher Columbus: The Discovery (1992)
[Note: It's a pity this didn't get released a week or so earlier--it could have
been r.a.m.r. #1492!  As it is, it will have to settle for 1506, the year of
Columbus's death.  -Moderator]
     Those familiar with the Salkind brothers had good reason to doubt
the quality of their Christopher Columbus film, CHRISTOPHER COLUMBUS -
The DISCOVERY.  Their last few ventures have hardly inspired much
confidence.  However, in the past they delivered not only SUPERMAN, but
also THE THREE MUSKETEERS and THE FOUR MUSKETEERS.  While far from a
perfect film, CHRISTOPHER COLUMBUS--THE DISCOVERY bears more resemblance
to the Salkind's earlier successes than to their more recent failures.
     CHRISTOPHER COLUMBUS--THE DISCOVERY covers Columbus' attempts to
convince someone to finance his journey, and his first voyage.  The
Salkind's decided to ignore his increasingly desperate later attempts to
prove that he had reached the Far East in favor of the great triumph of
his initial discoveries.  That decision is symptomatic of the entire
approach of the film.  While not entirely hagiographic, CHRISTOPHER
COLUMBUS--THE DISCOVERY is basically an adventure film about a great man
who performs a great deed despite determined opposition and tremendous
odds.  Taken purely as such, the film is basically a success.  If one
wants a more studied, intellectual approach to Columbus, perhaps Ridley
Scott's upcoming version will provide satisfaction.  If one is just
interested in a good time at the movies, the Salkind version does just
fine.
     CHRISTOPHER COLUMBUS--THE DISCOVERY is a very handsome film.  No
expense has been spared to make the film look good.  The set design, the
costumes, and the photography are all impeccable.  Given the film's
budget, and the past history of the Salkind's, that's not too
surprising.  Much more surprising is that moderate amounts of effort
have been spent on the script and the direction.  Mario Puzo, a Salkind
favorite after SUPERMAN, wrote the story, and receives a partial
screenplay credit.  John Wiley and Cary Bates get the first credit on
the screenplay.  (They apparently wrote most of what got shot.)  They
have created a reasonably paced, reasonably intelligent version of the
story.  Perhaps the script's biggest flaw is that it does not provide
sufficient depth to its central character, at least in the first hour of
the film.  Eventually, Columbus is revealed to be more than a visionary
standing heroically in the prow of his ship, but we aren't given quite
enough preparation for the darker side of the man, which emerges rather
suddenly.  
     Despite this flaw, and a perfunctory love interest, and some silly
lines, and a tendency to make nods in the direction of fashionable views
of history, the script is a success, on the whole.  Even some of the
politically correct touches are made to work.  As the Santa Maria pulls
away from Spain on its voyage, revealed behind it is a ship full of Jews
who are about to be deported from Spain.  The moment was carefully
prepared, the shot was well planned, so it achieves its effect.
     This shot, and some others, show that the director, John Glen, had
a bit more than hackwork in mind.  Glen graduated from being a second
unit director of James Bond films to being the director, and has done
the last four or five of them.  However, he's done little else, and has
gained a reputation as an action specialist.  The few action scenes in
this film show he hasn't lost his touch for staging violence, but he
gets a chance to show a bit more breadth of talent.  He has real
characters who get to speak real dialog to each other in this film, and
he handles it pretty well.  He also does nicely with the big moments of
the film.
     His handling of the actors is another strong point.  There is only
one truly weak performance in CHRISTOPHER COLUMBUS--THE DISCOVERY, and
it, fortunately, is in a supporting role.  The leads do quite well.
George Corraface is not well known to film audiences, but he has a
strong theatrical background, and was to play the lead in David Lean's
NOSTROMO.  He provides a good, solid Columbus, here.  He does the best
he can to mask the lack of early development of his character, so that
Columbus' nastier side does not come completely out of the blue.  But he
also manages to convey a sense of true heroism, as the success of the
film definitely required.  
     Marlon Brando, unjustly given top billing in a supporting role,
almost manages to justify it.  His is a superb performance, as
Torquemada, the Grand Inquisitor and confessor to Queen Isabella.  He
subtly underplays the part (not the type of acting choice Brando has
made for many years), and makes us wish that there were more scenes like
the one where he interrogates Columbus about the possibly heretical
aspects of the planned voyage.  Corraface manages not to disappear 
entirely in his scenes with Brando, but Brando confirms that he still
has the talent, when he chooses to show it.  It's an interesting choice
of the screenwriters to deliver a moral judgement on Columbus from
Torquemada's lips, and Brando manages to pull it off, in part because of
the sincerity of faith he has brought to the character earlier.  It
would be easy to play Torquemada as a sadistic, slavering villain, but
Brando's subtlety pays far greater dividends.
     The other major parts are Rachel Ward, as Queen Isabella
(adequate); Tom Selleck, as King Ferdinand (relatively speaking, a
triumph over unlikely casting - Selleck owes his costume maker a good
deal for the success of his performance, but he does bring it off); and
Robert Davi, as Pinzon, one of the captains of the small fleet and an
ambiguous character, part hero, part opportunist.  Davi doesn't quite
succeed in the slightly underwritten part, but doesn't fail utterly,
either.
     Given the limited ambition and goals of CHRISTOPHER COLUMBUS--THE
DISCOVERY, the film is just about as good as it could have been.  It's
nice to look at, not entirely devoid of intelligence, pretty
consistently entertaining, and generally well acted.  Its poor
advertising campaign and the mysterious decision by the releasing studio
not to pre-screen it for critics almost certainly doom it to failure at
the box office, but it really is worth seeking out before it disappears,
for those who have any interest in historical epics, at all.

Title
Review for Vreme na nasile (1988)
[This is another review from the rapidly receding AFI Los Angeles 
International Film Festival.  The film in question is probably not
playing at your local theaters, nor is it likely to any time soon.]
     Most Americans are extremely parochial in their film viewing
habits.  British films are unusual to them, French films exotic, and
Japanese films the furthest they might stretch, if that far.  A whole
world of cinema exists outside the attention of American viewers, a
world filled with worthwhile, and often brilliant, films.  When the
films in question require tremendous stretching of the viewers'
expectations of what a film is, a certain laziness is understandable.
Lots of people go to movies strictly for low-thought entertainment, and
they should not be expected to endure LAST YEAR AT MARIENBAD or the
latest enigma from Godard.  But there is still a body of fine,
entertaining film hidden away only because of language and cultural
barriers.  Americans will not read subtitles, for the most part, and
don't care to learn about any other nation's history or culture.  They
barely care about their own nation's, as the relative failure of GLORY
demonstrated.
     This parochialism is particularly evident when one sees a film like
TIME OF VIOLENCE.  A Bulgarian film, TIME OF VIOLENCE uses precisely the
same stylistic conventions as American films, the same form of
storytelling, the same approach to character, the same values as to what
makes a good story, and, moreover, it satisfies American criteria for
being a "good movie."  There is a basic story, with well-attached
subplots, lots of action, villains and heros (with a bit more
complexity, perhaps, than most American films), and a logical
resolution.  The production values are high, the performances excellent,
the direction skillful.  The film has done very well in many countries,
including some as foreign to Bulgarian culture as Japan.  So why can't
the filmmakers get *any* distribution deal in the U.S.?
     TIME OF VIOLENCE suffers only from its language and its setting.
Few Americans know much about the Balkans during the 17th Century.  But
it was one of those proverbial "interesting" times during which it was a
curse to live.  Most of the Balkans were under the thumb of the Ottoman
empire.  Islamic empires have more of a reputation for tolerance than
most, but the Ottoman empire was showing its ugliest face during this
period in Bulgaria.  Bulgaria was a strategically important area
inhabited by unreliable Christian subjects.  The sultan decided that
they must all convert to Islam, or die.
     TIME OF VIOLENCE focuses on the fate of one valley during this
crisis.  The son of the miller was taken off by the Turks years ago,
while still a boy, to become a janissary.  Janissaries were special
troops used by the Ottomans.  Recruited (involuntarily) from Christian
boys, they were separated from their families at an early age,
indoctrinated in Islam, and turned into fiercely reliable troops with no
allegiance to anyone but the sultan.  The miller's son is now a highly
trusted janissary, with the task of converting his entire home valley to
Islam.  But the people there take their religion very seriously, and
will not submit.  The janissary becomes more and more brutal in his
attempts to convert the valley, for he must slaughter them all if they
don't take the turban.
     The film is painted on a large, sweeping canvas, with many
characters and subplots, all cleverly woven into a single story.  (This
accomplishment is even more remarkable when you consider that the
original Bulgarian version was nearly two hours longer, yet there is no
sign at all that anything has been cut.)  And, surprisingly, this isn't
a "vile Turk" story.  Director  Ludmil Staikov has much more ambitious
goals, including an examination of the power of religion and of the
destructiveness of violence and fanaticism.  Not all of the Christians
are good, nor all of the Muslims bad.  The Turkish governor of the
valley is not loved by his subjects, yet does all he can to avert their
doom.  He is given a beautiful, tender moment as he leaves the valley
forever, in disgrace.  Crossing a bridge that leads out of his valley, 
he notices a stone that has worked out of place.  He gets down from his 
horse, carefully puts the stone back into its place, and then proceeds
on to his exile.  Even the janissary has his complexities, as he truly
wants to spare his people from unnecessary pain, despite having
completely transferred his loyalties to the sultan.  The screenplay, by
Staikov, Georgi Danailov, Mihail Kirkov, and Radoslav Spassov, provides
complex shadings of characters and motivations.
     TIME OF VIOLENCE is a professionally made film, beautifully
photographed, well edited, and with scrupulous care in costuming and set
design.  The period atmosphere feels perfectly authentic, at least to
someone with only passing familiarity with the time and place.  The
technical aspects of the film are well up to the standard of moderate
budget Hollywood movies.
     There are some unpleasant moments of torture and brutality in TIME
OF VIOLENCE, but they do not exist to excite or titillate.  Rather, they
are necessary to demonstrate the full scope of the tragedy.  Still, some
viewers may find themselves looking away during certain scenes.  But,
otherwise, TIME OF VIOLENCE is a film without flaws.  There are no
particularly weak points in the film, and many great virtues.
     The problem with TIME OF VIOLENCE is really just that most
Americans will never get the chance to see it, and, even if they had the
chance, most Americans wouldn't take it.  Dubbing the film might give it
a slightly wider audience, but even then it would be unlikely to draw
too many people.  If MOUNTAINS OF THE MOON, a pretty good
English-language African adventure film, can't bring in the audiences,
how can a film about a small country's historical woes?  At any rate, if
you do get a chance to see it, I recommend TIME OF VIOLENCE highly.

Title
Review for Portrait of a Lady, The (1996)
"The Portrait of a Lady" was one of the worst films I saw this year.
While I haven't liked all her films, I generally consider Jane Campion
to be an interesting director who, at least, never did anything that
was an imitation or a predictably dull effort.  As a result, I was
extremely disappointed with "The Portrait of a Lady."
"The Portrait of a Lady" is based on a novel by Henry James, written
in the 19th century.  It concerns a young American woman who comes
to Europe to visit relatives, and becomes involved with suitors both
European and American.  In a greater sense, it's another of James'
stories about the clash of American and European cultures.
The problems with the film start, as most films' problems do, with the 
script.  It's an over-long, rather straightforward telling of the story, 
with a few ill-advised stylistic flourishes.  Not having read the novel,
I will not comment on the script's faithfulness to the book, but it
is not successful on its own terms.  However, the script is not the
greatest problem with this film.
With one major and a couple of minor exceptions, the film was very badly
cast, with the greatest problems in the most central roles.  These 
casting mistakes, combined with the poor script and a lack of
directorial inspiration, sink the film.
The title role is the core of the problem.  Isabel Archer is meant to be
a truly extraordinary young woman, someone who inspires love in 
practically every man she meets and admiration in practically every
woman.   We are told that she is capable of great things, that she could 
live a life that would amaze us.  The script goes to great lengths to 
tell us how wonderful she is - but that's all it does, tell us.  It 
never shows us anything to make the audience admire the young woman.  A 
better script would have shown us the immense potential of this young 
woman, and made us understand why people are so very interested in her.  
Given that Laura Jones' script did not make that choice, the only hope 
was to cast the part with an actress with such fierce charisma and 
internal flame that we would immediately agree that she was indeed a 
remarkable woman, even if we never see her do or say anything
remarkable.  That means someone like a young Katherine Hepburn.
Nicole Kidman is beautiful, and reasonably talented, but she doesn't 
have that kind of charisma.  As a result, the audience is left to wonder
why everyone is making such a fuss over her.
John Malkovich is equally wrong for his part, that of an American
expatriate who has lived in Florence for years, cultivating a collection
of art and antiquities, seemingly doing little else.  The story demands
that he exert a nearly irresistible attraction on Isabel, who has been 
well able to resist the attractions of younger, wealthier, more handsome 
and eligible men.  There is absolutely nothing about Malkovich in this 
role that suggests he would attract such an extraordinary young woman.  
He's not handsome, the script gives him no real opportunity to dazzle 
her with his supposedly exquisite taste, and he doesn't even seem 
terribly interested in her.  Again, the writing required a far more 
charismatic actor. Malkovich does better when the darkest side of the 
character comes out, but that's too late to do much good.
Some of the supporting roles were cast with truly annoying actors.
Both Mary Louise Parker and Shelley Duvall, in rather similar roles as
eccentric busy bodies, made one wish that Arnold Schwarzenegger had a
role in the film, so there would be some hope that he'd suddenly show up
with a machine gun and blow them away.  Shelley Winters and Christian 
Bale were merely boring, a big step up.  Richard E. Grant and Viggo 
Mortenson play Kidman's other suitors, and were apparently chosen to 
give some credibility to the attractiveness of Malkovich, by contrast.  
They are acceptable, but unextraordinary.  Martin Donovan is not 
especially good as Kidman's consumptive, infatuated British cousin.  
John Gielgud appears briefly as Donovan's father, and does what he can 
with the part.
Barbara Hershey, on the other hand, seemed to be the only actor in 
command of her role.  Only she, among the leads, seems like she has the
characteristics the script claims for her.  She practically makes the 
film worth watching, at least during her scenes.  Ms. Hershey is a fine,
underappreciated actress who deserves the best roles.  She, and the 
production design (by Janet Patterson), were the only good qualities of 
the film.
As far as the direction goes, Jane Campion has made an excellent
audition piece for the Cinematic Academy of Embalming.  She did a
fine job convincing the audience that, yes, classics on the screen
*do* have to be a tedious chore to sit through.  She uses a glacial
pace, lots of long-held shots on the central character's face (in which
Ms. Kidman's expressive abilities are stretched well beyond her current
limitations), many stately tracking shots, and plenty of long-held
images of pretty scenery and architecture .  Most of the film looks like
Merchant/Ivory, without their driving intensity.  (That's a little joke,
in case it isn't clear.)  This is one seriously dull film.
Campion dolls the film up with various little cinematic tricks, perhaps
trying to convince herself that she wasn't making such a stodgy film.
In one scene, Isabel fantasizes about abandoning herself to her 
potential lovers, and they eventually disappear in gratuitous special 
effects.  The opening sequences features a bunch of modern young 
women talking about their lives in disconnected snippets.  Isabel's 
travels after meeting Malkovich are dealt with as a fake travelog done 
in the style of an early silent film.  And once in a while Campion 
chooses a skewed camera angle, for no apparent reason.  These departures 
from the overall style of the film seemed desperate.  Each is a
separate, momentary departure from the extremely conventional style of 
the body of the film.  They are in no sense part of an integrated whole, 
unlike, say, the bridging shots in "Breaking the Waves."
It's not actually the case that Henry James has to be dull, but you'd 
never guess that from "The Portrait of a Lady."  You'd be far better off 
seeing "The Heiress" again, or getting hold of the BBC production of 
"The Golden Bowl," than wasting time on "The Portrait of a Lady."

Title
Review for Lair of the White Worm, The (1988)
     Whatever else one may say about Ken Russell and his films, it must be
admitted that no one else makes anything like them.  That, in and of itself, is
praise of some sort.  Originality is always hard to come by.  Russell delights
in the outrageous, the bizarre, even in the tacky.  Yet he is a major film 
talent, with great visual gifts.  Which means that whenever Russell makes a new
film, you never can tell what you're going to get.  Maybe it will be THE MUSIC
LOVERS, WOMEN IN LOVE, MAHLER, or CRIMES OF PASSION.  On the other hand, it
might be SALOME'S LAST DANCE or LISZTOMANIA.  Part of the fun of seeing a new
Ken Russell movie is finding out which Ken Russell made it.
     THE LAIR OF THE WHITE WORM is vintage, though minor, Ken Russell.  It's
deliciously ludicrous and just barely under control.  Working from a turn of
the century horror novel by Bram Stoker, Russell updates and subverts the
horror/adventure genre in his own peculiar way.  The results are rarely
terrifying, but usually thoroughly entertaining.  The year has yet to produce
a stranger film.
     The story begins with a Scottish archeologist unearthing a huge snakelike
skull from a small excavation of a Norman convent.  Soon, the pretty sisters
who run the hotel on which the excavation took place are entangled in sinister
doings concerning local legends of a great white worm, pagan religion, and a
mysterious Lady.  Can the valiant archeologist and the local lord, a descendant
of a legendary worm-slayer, save the poor girls from Certain Doom?  
     Russell, who also wrote the screenplay, has taken a most unusual approach
to the story.  Originally set, of course, around the turn of the century,
Russell moves it into modern times.  But he keeps the flavor of Victorian
adventure novels.  With the tiniest of clues, the heros spin incredible, yet
utterly correct, theories that require complete rethinkings of their world
views.  And the most unlikely ideas work - this is a film where one can turn up
a mongoose in Midland England on a moment's notice, or where one's pater is
certain to have some snake-charming music in his old collection of North
African gramophone records.   On the other hand, Russell has injected a 
liberal dose of sex, much of it kinky, that Stoker surely did not include in
the novel.  He lets no opportunity pass to point out the phallic significance
of snakes.  Russell deftly turns cartwheels along a knife's edge between the
delightfully silly and the naively charming, balancing a metaphoric ball of 
perversion on his nose.
     The film is also visually interesting.  Russell is bold with his
camerawork, as always, and, as always, can be counted on to provide a
distinctive visual style to his films.  In this case, he and cameraman Dick
Bush provide two - one for the "real world", and one for a set of visions
inspired by snake venom.  In the real world, he moves the camera smoothly and
unobtrusively, lights the scenes with a fair number of sinister shadows, and
frequently recourses to wide angle lens to distort the picture, sometimes
slightly, sometimes wildly.  In the visions, Russell overlights and flattens
the shots, uses garish colors, snaps jarringly from one shot to the next, and,
generally, makes everything look cheap and sleazy.  One has definitely left
one world and entered another when he switches styles.
     Perhaps the most enjoyable aspect of the film is Russell's attention to 
details.  He is absolutely serious about being silly, so, when the evil 
villainess picks up a hitchhiker for nefarious purposes, it is, of course, a
Boy Scout.  Where does she spend her sleeping hours?  In an Indian snake
basket, of course.  And her favorite game is Snakes and Ladders.  
     Russell extends this attention to detail into the characters.  The local
lord has a wonderfully odd butler who obviously has no respect for his master 
and is prone to fall into vaguely lewd reminiscences of his adventures with the
previous lord.  His expression on being told to lock the chambermaids in their 
rooms is almost worth the price of admission on its own.
     In general, Russell's actors give him precisely what he wants -
straight-faced performances despite the general silliness.  The heros keep
their upper lips stiff despite appalling dangers, the heroines scream on cue,
and the supporting players die in stereotype.  The one exception, well
calculated, is Amanda Donohoe who plays the sinister villainess, conveying not
only the menace of the character, but an amusing self-awareness about just how
dotty her religion is.  Catherine Oxenberg and Sammi Davis play the girls,
while Peter Capaldi and Hugh Grant (last seen as the aristocrat in "Maurice")
play the archeologist and the lord, respectively.  
     One could not really say that THE LAIR OF THE WHITE WORM is a good film,
but it certainly isn't a dull one.  Russell has never done anything quite like
it before, yet it bears his distinctive mark and could not possibly have been
made by anyone else.  One leaves the theater wondering that he actually made
this film, and that somebody gave him millions of dollars to do it, and that,
against all odds, THE LAIR OF THE WHITE WORM was actually quite entertaining.

Title
Review for Husbands and Wives (1992)
     The press has been suggesting that more filmgoers will see Woody
Allen's new film, HUSBANDS AND WIVES, than any of his recent films.  If
that's true, it's a pity, because few of them are likely to come back
for a second helping.  HUSBANDS AND WIVES is definitely not one of
Allen's stronger efforts, though certainly he's done worse.
     The film concerns two couples who are going through trying times in
their marriages.  One couple is (predictably) played by Woody Allen and
Mia Farrow.  The other, less predictably, is played by Sidney Pollack
(better known as a director than actor) and Judy Davis, a fine
Australian actress not terribly familiar to the typical American
filmgoer.  At the outset of the film, Pollack and Davis announce they
are splitting up, after twenty-five years of marriage.  Their breakup
has traumatic effects on Allen and Farrow's marriage, as does the fact
that both Allen and Farrow begin to find themselves attracted to other
people.
     This scenario should bring to mind certain other films Allen has
done--ANNIE HALL, MANHATTAN, HANNAH AND HER SISTERS, perhaps INTERIORS
and SEPTEMBER.  It does share some characteristics with those films, in
that Allen builds the film out of seemingly random incidents in the
characters' lives.  Some of the incidents are momentous moments in the
characters' lives, some are everyday and serve to contrast the
characters' normal lives to their more stressful moments.  But HUSBANDS
AND WIVES has a different structure than Allen's earlier films.  It's
built like a pseudo-documentary.  In some scenes, the characters are 
being interviewed by an off-screen voice, talking directly to the
camera.  Allen's cinematographer, Carlo DiPalma, uses a handheld camera
that visibly shakes and wobbles throughout the film.  Allen uses other
stylistic touches borrowed from the world of the documentary, as well.
     Clearly, Allen had a particular effect in mind, since this isn't
the way he ordinarily shoots his films.  The whole approach of HUSBANDS
AND WIVES is somewhat sociological, as if Allen wanted us to accept the
film as a case study of certain marital behaviors, rather than as a
story.  In addition, the photographic techniques he uses clearly attempt
to make the viewer a participant in the film, by never permitting him to
forget that there is a camera there.  So criticism of the style of
HUSBANDS AND WIVES should be based on a failure of execution or
conception, rather than incompetence or lack of purpose.
     In some ways, just as INTERIORS was Allen's Bergman movie, and
STARDUST MEMORIES was his Fellini movie, HUSBANDS AND WIVES is his
Cassavettes movie.  But, just as INTERIORS was bargain basement 
Bergman, and STARDUST MEMORIES was faux Fellini, HUSBANDS AND WIVES is
clunky Cassavettes.  Allen isn't Cassavettes, just as he isn't Bergman 
or Fellini, and he has too strong a personal style to merely copy them.
Unfortunately, his personal style clashes with his model in each of
these films, to the detriment of the finished product.
     In particular, HUSBANDS AND WIVES suffers from problems in the
script, in the acting, and in the cinematography.  Cassavettes tended to
focus on people who were in the working class, or the middle classes.
Allen, as usual, focuses on New York intelligensia.  Cassavettes-style
grit and realism do not work nearly as well with in that milieu.
Allen's script also fails in the characterization.  The primary couple
are just plain dull, and their problems and concerns are hard to
sympathize with.  The secondary couple are better drawn, but are also on
the screen less.  
     The problems with the central characters is exacerbated by the
performers.  Woody Allen himself is an actor of limited range, the John
Wayne of New York urban angst.  In more challenging roles, his
limitations begin to show themselves, and the part he's given himself in
HUSBANDS AND WIVES is beyond his range.  He lacks the ability to show us
any depths to the character he is playing.  We can accept that he is the
person he is stated to be, but we cannot see anything beneath that
character's surface.  Since opacity is not part of the character's
conception, Allen's performance is a failure.  Mia Farrow does little
better with her role, falling back on her rather wan acting habits,
rather than creating a character.
     The two secondary players are much better.  Sidney Pollack, a fine
director whose acting has previously been limited to small parts, shows
tremendous talent in the rather cliched part of an aging husband who
leaves his wife for a young blond airhead.  Pollack's vitality suggests
that there is much more to the character than the cliche.  He tends to
take over every scene he is in, especially those with Allen.  Of course,
his is a showier part, but he outacts Allen even in smaller things.  For
instance, we see both characters in their workplaces.  Pollack looks at
home behind his desk, while Allen's professor looks like he's never
stood up in front of a class in his life.  (Of course, I knew professors
like that, too....)
     Judy Davis is probably the most talented performer of the leads,
and she does very well with a somewhat thankless part.  Her Australian
accent seems completely replaced with a New York one, she looks
perfectly at home in the city, and she establishes a rapport with
Pollack that makes the fiction of their characters' lengthy marriage
seem true.  But her performance and Pollack's are not enough, especially
given the amount of time they aren't on the screen.
     The only other major characters are the other partners in the
principal couples' lives.  Liam Neeson and Juliette Lewis have the
largest of these parts.  They're fine, but the script doesn't allow them
much opportunity to be anything but wish-fulfillment figures.  They lack
reality.
     The cinematography doesn't help the film.  As mentioned earlier,
DiPalma uses a handheld camera throughout, so the frame is perpetually
jiggling.  DiPalma further emulates the documentary style with
semi-controlled zooms into performers' faces, bringing them closer than
normal Hollywood photography does and chopping off the top and bottom of
their faces; and by jogging around with the camera when characters move,
rather than cutting to a new angle that frames them better.  These
techniques are annoying, but might have worked if Allen and DiPalma had
not undercut them with a lighting style that doesn't match them at all.
DiPalma uses the same rich, golden lighting used in most of Allen's
later films (and by most American films shot by European
cinematographers, for that matter), sort of the Dutch masters school of
lighting.  The studied, careful lighting simply doesn't match with the
pseudo-casual handheld framing and camera movement.
     Allen is too good a director to produce a complete bust, and
HUSBANDS AND WIVES is by no means Allen's worst film.  It has some
energy (unlike INTERIORS), a few funny lines and situations (unlike
ANOTHER WOMAN), and some interesting scenes (unlike SEPTEMBER).  These
virtues are enough to make HUSBANDS AND WIVES worthwhile for Allen fans,
but not nearly enough to convert those who do not know or like his
films.

Title
Review for Yinghung bunsik III (1989)
[This is the second in a series of reviews of films I saw at the recent
AFI Los Angeles Internation Film Festival.  For a report on the entire
festival, see rec.arts.cinema.]
     Not too many places outside of Hollywood make Hollywood movies.  The
British do a few, the French make comedies sufficiently like American ones to
get remade in English, Japanese samurai movies used to be rather similar to
American Westerns (but now both genres are dead).  That's about it, except for
Hong Kong.  Hong Kong makes action/adventure films that fit very well into the
Hollywood mold, except, of course, that the characters all tend to be  Chinese.
Otherwise, you could easily be seeing the product of Warner Brothers or, more
plausibly, New World Cinema.
     They do have their own local twists.  The culture they come from is 
different, and some of that inevitably shows up in Hong Kong films.  They 
don't have quite the budget American studios have, so some of the technical
aspects of their films are a little rougher.  By and large, the films are set
in Hong Kong or China, too, which aren't the most popular locales for Hollywood
films.  None the less, the pacing of the films, the subject matter, their
overall style are very familiar.  Hong Kong is thus in a good position to steal
away a little of the worldwide box office appeal of American films.
     A BETTER TOMORROW and its two sequels are cases in point.  These are cop
films, very much like the torrent of cop films flowing out of Hollywood.  A 
BETTER TOMORROW is a hybrid of two old formulae: the brothers/friends who grow
up to be on different sides of the law, and the criminal tries to go straight
despite the urgings of his old buddies.  The central figure in A  BETTER
TOMORROW, played by Leslie Cheung, is a gangster involved in counterfeiting.
His brother has just joined the police force, and, early in the film, he's
caught and sent to jail.  When he gets out, he wants to reform, but no one will
believe him.  And, in best Hollywood tradition, all problems are solved by
shooting lots and lots of people.
     There is a typically Chinese concern for family in A BETTER TOMORROW not
felt so strongly in American films.  The greatest desire of the central
character is to reconcile with his brother.  And loyalty is also an important
theme, more so than in American action pictures.  Cheung's buddy is being 
squeezed out of the gang, and treated very badly, and only by rejoining the
gang can Cheung help him.  But these themes are not played so strongly or with
such an exclusively Chinese tone as to make the film seem particularly foreign
to American audiences.
     What does make it foreign is the atrocious subtitling.  A BETTER TOMORROW
may have had the worst subtitling job I've ever seen.  It appeared to be done
by someone with the mistaken belief that he knows English.  The subtitles
veered from unintentionally funny to incomprehensible.
     That's not all that's wrong with A BETTER TOMORROW.  It sets itself up to
be judged by the same standards as American films, and, by those standards, it
comes up short.  The script, by John Woo, Chan Hing Kai, and Leung Suk Wah, is
rambling and untidy.  It takes a while to get down to business.  And the film
is technically inferior to a typical American production.  The cinematography
is uninspired, at best, and lots of small details of special effects, sound
editing, and other background issues are sloppy.  A single tune is played
relentlessly on the score.
     On the other hand, the acting is excellent.  Cheung,  Chow Yun-fatt, and
Ti Lung instill a sense of reality and likability into their characters.  One
car chase is like another, one gunfight is like another, so action films really
have to rely on their characters to distinguish themselves from the pack.  The
leading actors in A BETTER TOMORROW all have the kind of charisma and style
necessary to make their film stand out.  And director Woo handles the action
scenes pretty well.
     The first sequel, A BETTER TOMORROW II, is similar in tone.  Actually, I 
liked it better.  The subtitling had improved, there was more action, and 
everything moved faster.  A dubious plot trick necessitated by the ending of
the first film was given no more respect than it deserved, showing that the 
filmmakers weren't deluded about what sort of film they were making.  It was, 
at its heart, more of the same, just as LETHAL WEAPON II was more of the same
- a skillful repetition of the elements of the original that appealed to 
audiences.  Being able to recreate the atmosphere in a sequel is actually 
quite tricky, and writer Tsui Hark and co-writer and director John Woo pulled 
it off very well.  This film also suffers from some of the original's flaws.  
It rambles, with an unnecessary side-trip to New York City, in this case.  It 
isn't especially sensible.  And it's technically a bit rough.
     The third film, A BETTER TOMORROW III: LOVE AND DEATH IN SAIGON, is quite
different than its predecessors.  Set earlier than the first two films, it
deals with one of the main characters from the first film attempting to help
some friends get out of Saigon before the Communist takeover.  Romance plays a
much larger role in this film, and it's technically superior to the first two.
But there's less action, and only one of the characters who made the earlier
films interesting is here.  Actually, it's really not even the same character,
just the same actor playing a similar character with the same name.  There's
nothing in the third film to make us believe that he has anything in common
with the character in the earlier films.  New writers Tai Fu-Ho and  Leung
Yiu-Ming do not capture the aura of the first film, nor does Tsui Hark, taking
over as director.  On the whole, A BETTER TOMORROW III is the least 
interesting of these films, even though it is the most polished.
     A BETTER TOMORROW I, II, and III are interesting, if for no other reason,
as rare instances of other nations trying to beat Hollywood at its own game.
Certainly, within Hong Kong, they succeeded, as all three films were very 
popular there.  But somehow I doubt if they will significantly crack the
international markets, much less the highly lucrative U.S. market.  They lack
the craft of American commercial films, though the artistic level is about the
same.  Which is not necessarily a compliment.  Lovers of action films will
probably get a kick out of them, wherever they live and whatever language they
speak.  But Clint Eastwood, Sylvester Stallone, and Arnold Schwarzenegger need
not stay awake fretting over a Peril From the East.  Superficial commercial
films from Hong Kong don't beat superficial commercial films from U.S.  Yet.

Title
Review for Little Dorrit (1988)
     Hollywood has been doing violence to the works of Charles Dickens for some
years now.  At this very instant, two of his best known works are being mangled
on-screen, in SCROOGED and OLIVER AND COMPANY.  (I mean this not as a value
judgement of those films, but in reference to their fidelity to either the
letter or the spirit of their originals.)  Even the best film versions of
Dickens, even those from Britain, typically fail to give the full experience of
a Dickens novel.  LITTLE DORRIT comes closer to that experience than any film
ever has before.  And, even more amazingly, it manages to also make its own
artistic statement, in addition to, rather than instead of, what Dickens
intended.
     One obvious attribute that LITTLE DORRIT shares with the novel is length.
The novel was nearly a thousand pages.  The film is around six hours long.  It
is shown in two parts, subtitled "Nobody's Fault" and "Little Dorrit's Story."
Though some reviewers have claimed otherwise, they are not independent.  The
first part doesn't conclude the story, and the second doesn't contain enough
information to explain what is going on.  Moreover, there is a definite order
to the two parts.  Seeing "Nobody's Fault" first will lead to a much clearer
view of the film than seeing "Little Dorrit's Story" first.
     LITTLE DORRIT, like most of Dickens' novels, is a panoramic story set in
London in the mid-18th Century.  Typical of Dickens, the central character is a
child in trouble.  Little Dorrit is a young woman born and raised in
Marshalsea, a London debtors' prison.  Her father has been imprisoned there for
over twenty years, and has become known as "The Father of Marshalsea."  They
have no real hope that he will ever be released, and only the efforts of Little
Dorrit, plus Mr.  Dorrit's shameless habit of playing on the guilt of visitors,
allow the family to live in some small comfort.  But the picture changes when
Arthur Clennam, a decent middle-aged man recently returned from China, takes
notice of her.  He devotes himself to helping the Dorrit family, and, perhaps,
there will be some chance of obtaining the father's release.
     As in all Dickens' story, this barebones outline just scratches the surface
of the myriad subplots and complexities of the story.  Underlying the plot is
the theme of society's collective guilt for its treatment of its least
fortunate.  The title of the first half of the film is a recurring refrain,
"It's too bad, but it's nobody's fault."  Nothing is anybody's fault, nobody is
to blame, and, by extension, nothing can be done.  By focusing on this message,
the film version of LITTLE DORRIT proves just as relevant for today as the
novel was for Dickens' time.  The least fortunate are still miserable, and it's
still "nobody's fault" - because, though rarely acknowledged, it's really
everybody's fault.
     LITTLE DORRIT works, then, on the levels of a pure entertainment and as a
social commentary.  But, surprisingly, it also has an interesting third level.
The two parts of the film cover substantially the same ground.  Many scenes
from the first half are partially duplicated in the second.  But the first part
is told from the point of view of Clennam, while the second is told from the
point of view of Little Dorrit.  The repeated scenes are different, not only in
viewpoint, but in subtle details of conversation, settings, even costumes.  By
the middle of the second part, we realize that what we saw in the first part
was highly subjective.  It was how Clennam viewed the events of the story, and
that viewpoint was not omniscient, even in the scenes that he himself
participated in.  Nor is Little Dorrit's view of the scenes necessarily
correct, or even any more correct than Clennam's.
     At first, this duplication smacks a little of a not very interesting
trick.  So, the viewpoints are different, so what?  How does that fit in with
the rest of the film's themes?  But more consideration shows that the
bifurcation does fit in perfectly.  First, we see the story from the point of
view of a privileged person, for whom the ills of society really are "nobody's
fault".  He is a decent, good man, but he cannot see that the society which
supports and affirms him, by its very nature stamps down and denies others.
Then we see the story from the point of view of one who has directly suffered
from the machineries of that society, someone who can clearly see that there is
fault to be laid at the feet of those who do nothing to relieve the suffering
of the less fortunate, that they are profiting at the expense of the poor.  The
perniciousness of assigning no blame becomes very clear.  Writer-director
Christine Edzard has brought to the film not just fidelity and love, but
inspiration.
     Adding to the effect are the performances.  Derek Jacobi and Alec
Guinness, as Clennam and Mr.  Dorrit, lead a cast of less familiar names, but
great talents.  Jacobi takes a passive role that could easily have been boring
and makes every instant of it fascinating.  He's done this before, and I can
think of no surer mark of a great actor than to be able to hold the attention
of an audience while playing a quiet role in the midst of many other colorful
characters.  Guinness' performance is also superb.  Mr.  Dorrit is in some ways
pitiable, in others almost a monster.  He is a man obsessed with appearances,
even while in the depths of poverty.  He doesn't mind his daughter slaving to
permit him small luxuries, but he makes sure no one sees her doing it.
Guinness uses every tool of the actor brilliantly to make us understand,
sympathize, and condemn his character.
     A few names in the supporting cast are familiar.  Robert Morley shows up
briefly, almost irrelevantly.  Cyril Cusack plays Guinness' brother quietly,
but effectively.  Joan Greenwood is the picture of motherhood as a flinty,
barren field.  The rest of the roles are filled by fine British actors with
faces that are sometimes familiar, and are always brimming with Dickensian
eccentricity.  Especially fine are Roshan Seth as the brisk, somewhat
mysterious Mr. Pancks, and Miriam Margolyes, as the love of Clennam's youth.
Margolyes produces perhaps the finest Dickens comic caricature ever brought to
the screen, and is utterly hilarious.  Sarah Pickering deserves special
mention.  The role of Little Dorrit is even more passive than that of Clennam,
yet Pickering uses every opportunity the script offers to show her quiet,
self-effacing heroism.
     LITTLE DORRIT, all six hours of it, was shot in a studio.  It shows, yet
perhaps that is not inappropriate.  In some sense, Dickens' writing portrayed
the literary equivalent of a studio version of 19th century England.  It was
not precisely realistic, but offered a concentrated, artificial version of the
real world that, paradoxically, allowed him to more closely approach the truth
of the age than strictly accurate reportage ever could.  Christine Edzard uses
the studio to the same effect.  Artifice is plain enough that we never truly
believe that her cameras have traveled through time to the 19th century, but
the artifice is so well and carefully crafted that we feel the essence of the
time.
     The sets and costumes are little short of brilliant.  Almost everything
used in the film was produced from scratch for the film.  The care for detail
is obvious, as is the research that must have gone into the art direction.  And
these details are not merely window dressing, but are used to deepen and
broaden the canvas of the film.  The costumes give a further dimension to each
character, and the sets establish not just place, but mood.  LITTLE DORRIT
offers an unusually fine example of the use of visual details to support a
film.
     LITTLE DORRIT is not without its weaknesses.  The primary one is that the
second half of the film is too repetitious.  Edzard had to tread a fine line
between repeating too much of the material from the first half and not showing
enough of it to make the differences in the points of view clear.  She seems to
have erred on the side of revisiting too much material.  This problem is
compounded by the fact that few interesting new characters are introduced in
the second half of the film, and also by seeing too little of the most
entertaining characters from the first half.  Another flaw that could have been
easily avoided is confusion in the final resolution of a mystery set up
practically from the beginning of the film.  Given that the film ran six hours,
surely another minute could have been devoted to clearing up the rather tangled
strands.  From a technical point of view, sometimes the limited budget shows
through a bit too clearly, particularly in some of the mattes and models.
     But these weaknesses are minor.  On the whole, Edzard has made a superb
film.  LITTLE DORRIT is most heartening because it shows not only talent, but
true direction.  Most promising new directors make more interesting versions of
what everyone else is making.  Edzard has boldly chosen a path of her own, and
leads the rest of the participants of the film in the direction she has
discovered.  LITTLE DORRIT may not be the easiest film to see, but it is
extremely entertaining, artistically satisfying, and socially conscious.  No
other film I've seen this year has tried so much.  The real miracle of LITTLE
DORRIT is how much of the ambition has been realized.

Title
Review for No Way Out (1987)
     NO WAY OUT is a splendid example of how to make a good suspense film.  It
has a good plot, interesting atmosphere, first-rate acting, well-chosen
cinematography, tense direction, and, best of all, intelligence.  The elements
are very nicely blended into what has to be one of the finest suspense films of
the decade.
     The key here is "suspense."  NO WAY OUT isn't an action picture.  It's a
lot more like a classic Hitchcock film, with the strongly Hitchcockian plot of
a trapped innocent in over his head to go along with it.  The hero finds
himself caught in a web of intrigue, and, true to the title, it does begin to
look like there is no way out for him.  He has to struggle with all his wits
just to keep disaster from striking immediately, and has little time left to
prevent the seemingly inexorable doom that is about to descend.
     To avoid spoiling the effect of NO WAY OUT, I'll have to be rather vague
about its plot and themes.  NO WAY OUT concerns a US Navy officer who finds
himself unwillingly entangled with Washington politicians in a battle to cut
the funding on a huge military project.  Personal factors further complicate
matters, and the scheming of politicians eventually threatens his very life.
Circumstances leave him without any room to move, about to be crushed in an
impersonal juggernaut.
     Kevin Costner plays the officer, giving his best performance to date.  We
can see him not only thinking of how to escape, we can see him trying to
conceal his thoughts from those around him.  Costner succeeds best in the most
important aspect of his role.  In order for the audience to become truly
worried about his plight, the audience has to truly identify with him.  Costner
gives us a figure who deserves our sympathy.  Costner's previous work has
seemed almost like a prepartion for stardom, and this role, on top of his
success in THE UNTOUCHABLES, may well do it for him.
     Gene Hackman leads a fine supporting cast, giving his reliably solid
performance as the Secretary of Defense.  Credit goes to Hackman, and to Robert
Garland, the screenwriter, for giving this character room to show complexities.
A more typical filming of this story would have presented a figure cut from
cardboard.  This willingness to take the extra effort is representative of the
film.  All of the characters have the opportunity to show themselves as real
people, rather than story-driven placeholders.  Sean Young, George Dzunda,
Howard Duff, and Iman all take advantage of this opportunity.  The best of the
supporting performances is that of Will Patton, as Hackman's fiercely loyal
hatchetman.  Patton's intensity is chilling.  His performance as the underling
who puts his patron's success above all else rings all too true.
     Roger Donaldson, the director of NO WAY OUT, hasn't shown a very special
talent before this film.  A New Zealander, he previously directed SMASH
PALACE, THE BOUNTY, and MARIE, putting in professional efforts on all of them,
but demonstrating little more.  Here, though, his direction is near perfect.
Starting from a quiet pace more typical of a drama than a suspense film,
Donaldson builds to hectic excitement by the end.  He and cinematographer John
Alcott have established a film in which the subtext is claustrophobia.  The
open, airy shots near the beginning of the film wind in to tighter and tighter
compositions as Costner's situation becomes more and more desperate.  The
intent is to make the audience feel as trapped as Costner's character, and it
works superbly.  Alcott, in his last film, shows again that he was one of the
masters of the camera, expressing a strong sense of being closed in without
ever feeling static.  The cinematography of NO WAY OUT does not permit him as
much chance to display virtuosity as, say, BARRY LYNDON did, but Alcott well
shows how a cinematographer can support a film without taking it over.
     Another element of NO WAY OUT deserves special mention--the production
design.  The designer ably abets the claustrophobia built by Donaldson and
Alcott.  His sets, especially the Pentagon interiors that host most of the
film's second half, are both accurate and appropriate.  His Pentagon has very
much the tacky and impermanent look of the real thing.  He plays up the
submarine-like qualities of the building, the long corridors without windows,
the military-drab walls, the feeling that, despite being the largest building
on earth, quarters are rather cramped.  He also gives a feel for the odd
topologies of the building, the interconnecting offices, the concentric ring
construction, the unexpected facilities and occasional decorations.
     NO WAY OUT is, on the whole, one of the best films released this year.  It
is both intelligent and entertaining, and has the additional advantage of
topicality.  Roger Donaldson crafts his film carefully, giving us a film about
people in a suspenseful situation, rather than mere actors going through the
paces.  NO WAY OUT is a suspense film that Hitchcock would have appreciated,
far more than any of Brian De Palma's ripoffs.  One can but hope that audiences
appreciate it, as well.

Title
Review for Good Mother, The (1988)
     Unlikely as it may seem, Leonard Nimoy is one of the hottest directors in
Hollywood.  ("In the land of the deaf, he with pointed ears is king?")  
Successes with the Star Trek movies, followed by THREE MEN AND A BABY, have
made him highly sought after.  Nimoy is now attempting to parlay his successes
with comedy and science fiction into a broader career.  THE GOOD MOTHER is his
bid for respectability.  While a reasonably good film itself, Nimoy is not 
likely to strike box-office pay dirt with it, nor to earn the respect of his 
peers.
     THE GOOD MOTHER, based on a novel by Sue Miller, is a serious drama about
a custody suit filed against a divorced mother.  The underlying theme is not
the custody battle itself, but the concept of motherhood in modern America.  Is
motherhood a sufficient self-definition for a woman?  How much should a mother
sacrifice for her child?  Should a mother have complete say over the way she
raises that child?  The novel apparently addressed those questions squarely.
The film deals with them obliquely, preferring to get down into the TV movie
aspects of the story.
     Given the choice of director and leading actress, this approach was
probably inevitable.  While Nimoy made STAR TREK IV entertaining, and THREE MEN
AND A BABY delightful, he had given no indication that he had any special 
talent for more serious work.  Diane Keaton, who plays the mother in the film, 
has made a habit of having herself miscast in films based on successful novels.
THE GOOD MOTHER continues that trend.  In order to explore the issues without 
bogging down in the melodrama, THE GOOD MOTHER needed a director experienced 
in the complexities of drama (such as, perhaps, Sydney Pollack) and an actress 
who brings less history to her roles (such as, perhaps, Barbara Hershey).  But 
Touchstone chose commercialism over the possibility of brilliance.
     What's most disheartening about this choice is that the powerful drama
that obviously attracted all involved to THE GOOD MOTHER doesn't come through
nearly as strongly as it should.  The fault can be divided between Michael 
Bortman's script, Nimoy's direction, and, to a lesser degree, to Keaton.  
Bortman's screenplay tries to preserve some of the complexities of the novel, 
particularly in an extended prologue that is connected to the rest of the story
by theme, rather than by plot.  This sort of digression is a commonplace in 
novels, but is much trickier in films.  Bortman's script fails to integrate 
the prologue's theme into the rest of the film, yet later scenes depend on 
information from the prologue, making it indispensable, yet irrelevant.  While 
this is the most obvious failing of the script, the construction never seems 
very strong.  Also, it takes far too long to get to its main conflict, yet 
still fails to establish the necessary background to make that conflict work.  
The dialog, on the other hand, is fairly good.  It sounds realistic without 
being trite, and, with reasonable economy, conveys what must be told.
     Nimoy's direction is competent, but undistinguished.  The film has no
strong visual feel.  It looks like a well-lit TV movie, with predictable
two-shots and alternating closeups during conversations.  Nimoy tracks the
camera only when the characters are walking, and otherwise moves it only when
absolutely necessary.  The single shot that deviates from this dull pattern is
itself a cinematic cliche - a static medium shot of an emotionally devastated
character who doesn't move as the lighting slowly changes.  You've definitely
seen this one before, and done better.  David Watkin, the cinematographer,
lights the scenes warmly and well, but otherwise does not make a strong
contribution to the film.  The pacing of THE GOOD MOTHER is staid and reverent,
with only a moment or two of excitement.  On the up side, Nimoy does well with
the actors, at least with those who the script has provided sufficient meat to
sculpt a character.  And, while his direction shows no brilliance, Nimoy makes
no terrible mistakes.  THE GOOD MOTHER is definitely a good job of
craftsmanship, if not a work of art.
     Keaton's performance is probably about as good as it could be, within the
boundaries she brought to the role.  To some extent, Keaton will always live in
our memories as Woody Allen's eccentric girlfriend.  Her success in a part 
often depends on whether the audience can accept that Annie Hall might have 
"grown up" to be that woman.  And I suppose Annie Hall could have grown up 
into THE GOOD MOTHER.  Keaton fails to lose herself in the role, but gives a
reasonable portrayal of what it might be like for a woman like her to have the
experiences of the character in the film.  The problem is that her image
distances us from the character, it keeps bringing up the unreality of the
film.  A lesser known actress might have been able to suck us in to the reality
of a mother in danger of losing her child, rather than constantly reminding us
that it's only a movie.  Keaton's performance does carry much of the necessary
anguish and passion.  (Perhaps the only avoidable failing in her performance
is that she does not show us the character's strong bond to her child.  She
seemed more attached to the child in BABY BOOM than to her screen daughter
here.)
     The script provides a few other parts worthy of notice.  Jason Robards
does his usual wily lawyer act as Keaton's attorney.  It is, as always, a good,
entertaining act.  Ralph Bellamy's part, as Keaton's grandfather, seems to have
suffered in the transition from novel to screen.  His character feels like 
there's a lot of explanation left out.  Oddly, the omissions actually work, 
perhaps because of the mystery.  His relationship with Teresa Wright, who plays
Keaton's grandmother, provides the film's only suggestion that the film's 
characters have some life that isn't a part of this story.  Wright is very 
fine in her part.  She is sympathetic, yet strong, and convinces us that the 
woman she plays really lived.
     The best of the supporting roles is that given Liam Neeson, who plays the
new man in Keaton's life, the unwitting catalyst for the catastrophe that
befalls her.  Neeson has often been cast in unsympathetic roles, but THE GOOD
MOTHER offers him practically a romantic lead.  The script is more than
generous with his character, giving him good scenes and several important
dramatic moments.   Neeson makes the most of his opportunity.
     THE GOOD MOTHER is a good film, one well worth seeing.  It has power in
its portrayal of a devoted mother in danger of losing custody of her child
without having done anything wrong.  Keaton gives a fine performance, the
supporting cast is good, the script and direction competent.  The only problem
with THE GOOD MOTHER is that it could have been much more than it is.

Title
Review for Seppan (1986) (TV)
The following review is of a film appearing at the recent AFI Film Festival
in Los Angeles.  I have no way of knowing whether the film reviewed will
appear at any normal theaters any time in the near future (or even at all).
     Sometimes it seems like every Scandinavian film made since Ingmar Bergman
retired is about children.  In the Eighties, I've probably seen a couple of
dozen new films from Sweden, Norway, Denmark, and Finland, and almost half of
those have been primarily about children.  In that time I've seen four Danish
films, four Swedish films, a Norwegian film, and a Finnish film that took
children as their main subject.  (Plus an Icelandic one, which I guess should
count, as well.)  What could cause this seeming obsession?  Do the
Scandinavians really just make films about kids?  Or are their films about
children the only ones good enough to bother showing abroad?  Or do US
distributors feel their market will be more amenable to Nordic tots than
sub-Arctic angst?   Well, most of them are quite good, so I guess I shouldn't
complain, but the phenomenon is still odd.
     What brought this imbalance in subject matter to my attention was the
first film I saw at the current AFI Film Festival.  SEPPAN is yet another
Swedish film about kids.  Because it's set in the 1950s, and because the AFI
Festival is not above just about any misrepresentation that will get people to
come see their films, the program billed it as similar to MY LIFE AS A DOG.  In
actuality, other than the period, and a coincidental bit about Soviet
satellites, there's no resemblance, either in subject matter or quality.
     SEPPAN is about a group of children whose parents were World War II
refugees who fled to Sweden.  Temporarily settled in Seppan, a suburb of
Stockholm, children from Finland, Russia, and Austria intermingle, in the
process of becoming Swedish.  The film traces about one year in the life of
some of these children, focusing primarily on two girls on the verge of
adolescence.
     Perhaps "focusing" is a poor choice of words, though, because the film's
major problem is focus.  SEPPAN doesn't seem to have much of a point.
Director/writer Agneta Fagerstrom-Olsson does not choose any central linchpin
for her story.  There are a few tragedies, some growing up, an unenthusiastic
examination of the relationships of parents and children, a dalliance with a
look at childhood friendship, and, finally, some episodes dealing with the
cruelty of children.  The whole seems more like a reminiscence without a point
than a story.  SEPPAN is moderately interesting in its parts, but never comes
together into a whole.
     Fagerstrom-Olsson deserves praise for some aspects of the film, however.
The acting of the children is marvelously natural.  The script has the feel of
truth, though, alas, also the feel of irrelevancy.  The photography (by John O.
Olsson) is interesting and pretty in a gloomy, overcast way.  Fagerstrom-
Olsson definitely has the courage of her convictions, in her willingness to
show children as they really are, rather than as we'd like them to be.  But, in
her attempts to avoid crowd-pleasing sellouts, she has failed to substitute
anything to interest the audience, at all.
     SEPPAN is not too likely to get much play outside of Scandinavia, except,
perhaps, at film festivals.  If it does, it certainly won't match the success
of MY LIFE AS A DOG.  The experience of watching SEPPAN is like hearing
someone talk extemporaneously about their childhood.  Unless one shares the
experiences, or unless the experiences are extraordinary, or unless the teller
is a master, childhood reminiscences are usually less than fascinating.
SEPPAN fails on the latter two counts, so its potential interest for a viewer
must be based on their childhood's relationship to Swedish post-WWII refugee
camps.

Title
Review for In Country (1989)
     Some novels make good films.  Some novels don't.  One good predictor of
whether a novel will make a good film is how much the novel depends on the
inward lives of its characters.  DAVID COPPERFIELD, full of incident and
activity, could make a good film.  So could GONE WITH THE WIND, or THE HUNT FOR
RED OCTOBER, or TAIPAN.  (As the last example shows, just because it could make
a good film doesn't mean it will.)  ULYSSES, in which the inward voice of the 
author and the details of the central character make the trivial heroic, 
probably could not make a good film.  Neither would CATCHER IN THE RYE, THE
SOUND AND THE FURY, or ALICE ADAMS.  (Again, the latter example shows that
there are exceptions.)  IN COUNTRY was obviously based on a very  "interior"
novel.  Things happen, but most of them aren't terribly dramatic.  So
expecting the film to be completely successful is asking too much.  What's 
heartening about IN COUNTRY is that parts of it work very well.
     IN COUNTRY concerns a Kentucky girl who has just graduated from high
school.  Gradually, her father, who died in Vietnam, comes to be more and more
important in her life.  She must undergo a difficult, painful growth before
finding the right place in her heart for him.  At the same time, her uncle, an
embittered veteran, wastes his life because he cannot escape the pain of his
experiences.  I'll bet this read very, very well.  It films only moderately
well, and only because some very talented people have done superb work.
     Foremost is Emily Lloyd, as the girl.  Lloyd, an English actress whose
first film, WISH YOU WERE HERE, demonstrated her ample promise, here succeeds
in an entirely different type of part.  Working behind a flawless Kentucky 
accent (at least to my untutored ear), she portrays a nice, ordinary girl who
finds that her normalcy is undermined by her father's experiences in Vietnam,
even though she never met him.  Lloyd ably shapes the character of a typical 
American teenager discovering that there is more to the world than her first 
car, her boyfriend, and going to the shopping mall.
     Bruce Willis does a nice job as her Uncle Emmett.  Willis was a bold
choice, since his previous film roles do not suggest depth.  However, he
willingly buries himself in the character.  No wiseacre smirks at the camera,
no smugly hip attitudes, just an honest and successful attempt to build a
character around his gifts.  His performance demonstrates that he is an actor
with more use than carrying DIE HARD II.  Unfortunately, the combination of
performance, script, and direction fail to lift Emmett above the role of plot
functionary.  He has reality, but he lives in the background.
     Any problems with IN COUNTRY have nothing to do with the acting.  The
problems are in the script, and, before that, probably in the whole idea of
making a film from the book.  IN COUNTRY is filled with modern novelistic
digressions.  It perpetually wanders from its central theme.  In the novel,
these digressions were probably seamlessly integrated into the experiences of
the central character, enriching the reader's understanding of her growth.
Writers Frank Pierson and Cynthia Cidre and director Norman Jewison fail to
blend them into the story.  They are drags on the film, which, around the
hour-and-a-half mark, begins to feel drawn out.
     Fortunately, Pierson, Cidre, and Jewison are able to finish very strong.  
Bobbie Ann Mason's novel gave them one perfect cinematic scene to work with, 
and they make that sequence play extremely well.  The final scenes are highly 
moving, and redeem the slowness of the earlier film.  
     Jewison has plenty of good cinematic credits, including literary
adaptations, such as IN THE HEAT OF THE NIGHT.  He does well with IN COUNTRY,
but there are two potential problems with his choice as a director.  First, he
is  Canadian, and the heart of the story is how the Vietnam War has affected
even those Americans who weren't born at the time.  Second, it is a girl's
story, not a boy's.  Jewison manages to imagine his way past the first problem,
but not entirely past the second.  IN COUNTRY seems an authentically American
experience, but not completely a female one.  We've seen a lot of films in the
last ten years that sensitively present boys' stories, but not nearly as many
that have a girl as the central character.  Part of the reason is that most
writers and directors are male.  They identify with the male experience, and
understand it.  To make a good film about a woman, they must rely on
imagination, always in short supply in Hollywood.  Jewison successfully
imagines himself a U.S. citizen, but not a young woman.  As a result, the film
looks at its central character from outside, despite the fact that the story is
presented through her eyes.  That Lloyd's character is not totally a cipher is
due to her talent, and, perhaps, the contribution of Cynthia Cidre to the
script.  Jewison must also bear primary responsibility for the lugubrious
pacing of IN COUNTRY.
     The supporting cast is good, with Peggy Rea, as Lloyd's grandmother, a
standout.  Judith Ivey also does well with relatively few scenes, playing
Emmett's old girlfriend who wants him back.  Kevin Anderson mostly drives a car
in a somewhat dispensable role as Lloyd's boyfriend.
     The technical credits are high-quality Hollywood professionalism, which is
the best film professionalism in the world.  Not brilliant, not inspired, but
very competent and well executed.  James Horner's rather routine score fills a 
similar bill, supplemented by several rock songs, especially an overused and 
somewhat inappropriate Bruce Springsteen number.  No one in this film is any
hotter than a low smouldering, much less on fire.
     IN COUNTRY is another of those praiseworthy Hollywood films.  Everyone had
good intentions, everyone did a good job, some people even did a great job.
But it is only moderately successful, none the less, with none of the snap and
heat of a really strong film.  The ending is so surefire and so well executed
that it overcomes many of the rather routine aspects of the rest of the film.
It makes the film worth seeing, especially when coupled with  Emily Lloyd's
performance.

Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
"The Thin Red Line" is a fine example of a failure of vision, a rather
rare failing in American film.  Writer/director Terrence Malick
reached too far and tried for too much.  As a result, his film works
in places, but fails as a whole.
The story concerns an Army company assigned to assist in clearing
Japanese troops out of the island of Guadalcanal in World War II.  The
company must land on a possibly fortified beach and seize a key ridge
that commands an important airfield.  Many men will clearly die in the
effort.
This story would normally be told in a rather straightforward way, as
indeed it was in the previous (rather weak) adaptation of the James
Jones novel the film is based on.  Malick uses a different approach,
which has more in common with the literary than with classical film
methods.  Malick's presentation starts with a lengthy pre-invasion
sequence that seems at first to suggest an anthropological
documentary, and then to suggest that a particular character, Pvt.
Witt (Jim Caviezel), will be a focus for the film.  Witt is a natural
rebel who curiously seems to be both completely out of place and
comfortably at home in the Army.  But Malick quickly moves on to
sketch a dozen or so other characters at various levels of detail,
with the deepest treatment reserved for Pvt. Bell (Ben Chaplin), a
former officer whose love of his wife lead to his resignation and
later drafting; and Battalion commander Col. Tall (Nick Nolte), an
overage officer who seethes with hidden rage at being passed over for
promotion and plans to prove his worth with the upcoming battle.
Malick deploys several of his major cinematic devices early.  We see
many shots of nature, especially the exotic animals and plants of the
South Seas.  These recur throughout the film, occasionally in integral
portions of the story, but more often as side comments on the
proceedings.  Malick also begins the use of voice overs to reveal
characters' internal thoughts.  Many of the film's characters speak to
us in voice over throughout.  Finally, Malick introduces flashbacks to
the earlier lives of a couple of the characters.  The device is used
most heavily for Pvt. Bell.
These devices are central to Malick's presentation, and clearly served
as organizing principles for the entire work.  The other major
elements shaping the work are Malick's intention to present the events
of the film as influences on his characters, rather than as a plot
that the characters move forward; and his desire to incorporate
different perspectives into the film.  Malick clearly intends them to
serve his greater end, which is to investigate how men choose to live
their lives and why those choices so often lead to disaster.  Unlike
so many films, this film's structure, down to fairly fine details, was
clearly well thought out and planned in the mind of a director who saw
in his mind's eye what he wanted.
The vision of the mind's eye is not always as clear as one might hope.
The devices Malick deploys often fail, and they ultimately sink the
film.  The interminable pre-invasion sequence drags the film down.  By
the time Malick has gotten his men on the beach, many viewers will
already have written the film off.  Malick's use of voice over, with
multiple characters thinking deep thoughts, is bold but ineffective.
Too often we are uncertain which of the many characters is sharing his
thoughts with us.  Worse, too often those thoughts are expressed in
pretentious language that seems highly unlikely to inhabit the minds
of the characters.  When they are far more likely to be thinking "how
the hell am I going to get out of this alive," we hear them discussing
fine philosophical points in language more suited to poetry than the
heat of combat.
The flashbacks are similarly distracting, especially those to Pvt.
Bell's marriage.  Malick shows us these scenes incessantly, often at
key moments in the action.  The effect is to convince us that Bell's
obsession with his wife is very, very important, and will be key to
the action, or the theme of the film, or understanding important
character developments.  Ultimately, it proves to be none of these.
Far too little in the film comes of this obsession to justify the time
spent on it, and, worse, the breakup in the continuity of the action.
I presume Malick understood this and did it anyway for some specific
reason, but that reason is unclear to me.
Malick's choice to render Jones' book in fuller complexity than is
typical of adaptations also leads to a shifting focus among the
characters.  It takes quite a while to determine just which of them
are going to be important.  In typical Hollywood films, the shorthand
for handling this problem is to cast famous actors, or at least
familiar faces, in most of the important roles.  But in "The Thin Red
Line," not only do stars play small, trivial roles (George Clooney's
role seems especially pointless), but familiar faces like John Savage
and John C. Reilly crop up in parts that ultimately are of little
consequence.  Nothing says that a director has to use the conventional
methods to sort out confusion, but if he doesn't use those methods, he
needs some other method.  Malick either denies the requirement or his
methods failed.  It takes a long time to determine who is who here,
and some of the characters never really achieve any clear separation
from the others.
These choices harm the film.  And that's a tremendous shame, as the
film has some extremely strong elements.  In addition to the most
obvious (excellent cinematography), several performances are very
strong.  Nolte and Elias Koteas deserve the greatest honors here, as
they manage to convey clear characters and relationships in the face
of the confusions of the rest of the film.  Other actors, like Sean
Penn and Jim Caviezel, do well enough, but it seems like Malick has
left out key scenes or important information that would bring strong
individual moments together into a coherent performance.  There are
clear elements of a strong, important contrast between these two
characters, but the film comes just short of clarifying that contrast.
The center section of the film (in itself, as long as a conventional
film) is powerful.  This section, which has the clearest focus,
concerns an assault on a strongly held ridge and its immediate
aftermath.  Malick stages this section of the film brilliantly,
managing to make clear the complexities of the combat while
simultaneously showing the chaos of its execution.  His use of
locations is particularly strong here.  The hills the troops must
climb are covered with shoulder-high grass, and Malick uses this and
other topographical features to convey the terror of the unknown that
troops must feel when assaulting an enemy position.  You never know
whether, in the next moment, the grass will part to reveal just more
grass, or the enemy about to kill you.  Death strikes from afar, as
unseen machine guns suddenly end lives.
Unfortunately, Malick still has more than half an hour's material
after this sequence is completed.  He ultimately has one more climax
he wishes to show, but the dramatic timing used to transition from the
aftermath of the attack to this sequence is stilted.  The film seems
like it's going to end several times, only to go on.
Malick is also to be praised for his fairness in treating his
characters.  The most obvious instance is how the Japanese, initially
little more than deadly ciphers, become extremely human and
sympathetic on closer examination.  But Malick gives the same
treatment to other characters, as well.  Nolte's obsessive Colonel,
who forces assaults that seem suicidal and has too little concern for
the welfare of his men, ultimately is shown to have made the correct
military choices, and, more surprisingly, to have more compassion for
the tragedy of the battle than one would have expected.
Many critics have said that "The Thin Red Line" improves greatly on
second viewing, as the viewer now has a better idea of what to expect.
Perhaps that's true.  However, on first viewing "The Thin Red Line"
plays as an exceedingly ambitious failure with some strong
compensating virtues.  As such, it's definitely worth seeing, but only
for those willing to accept a different approach to film than one
traditionally sees, and those willing to overlook some fairly large
flaws.

Title
Review for Two Jakes, The (1990)
     THE TWO JAKES is a failure on two different fronts (three, if you
believe the weekend box office figures that show it was only the seventh
biggest draw in its opening weekend).  It fails as a sequel to
CHINATOWN, and it fails as an independent movie.  People who haven't
seen CHINATOWN (or don't remember it) won't understand much of what's
going on, while people who have will probably judge THE TWO JAKES
harshly in comparison.  Both groups are liable to find it overlong and
slow.
     Jake Gittes, the private investigator from CHINATOWN, is back, with
World War II under his belt and success in his profession that
approaches respectability.  But he's still haunted by the ghosts of his
past.  When a seemingly routine divorce case explodes in his face, the
past rushes in to envelop him.  He's faced with the challenge of solving
his immediate problems while simultaneously reconciling with the past.
Of course, the past and the present prove to be inextricably linked.
     Jack Nicholson returns as Jake Gittes, and also directs the film.
In addition, he did some rewriting of Robert Towne's script; at the
minimum, the narration is Nicholson's.  He proves himself an excellent
actor, a reasonable writer, and a pedestrian director.  Gittes is a very
finely delineated character, with great depths and complexities.
Nicholson builds the character not just with his dialog, but with his
expressions, his gestures, his costumes, and his surroundings.
Nicholson's performance is one of the best of the year, and one reason
to see THE TWO JAKES.
     The script is not such a good reason.  Towne has not provided as
strong a story for THE TWO JAKES as he did for CHINATOWN, nor are the
supporting characters as interesting.  Towne did write some good lines,
and decent scenes, but failed in terms of the overall script.  He relies
rather heavily on echoing CHINATOWN -- two thugs menace Jake, there's an
elderly mysterious rich man, changes of land titles figure heavily in
the plot.  The idea was probably to set up resonances in the minds of
both Gittes and the audience, but it doesn't work.  The mystery isn't
good enough, either.  We may not guess everything that's going on, but
we don't care enough about the resolution.  The narration added by
Nicholson works reasonably well, showing how completely Nicholson has
absorbed the character of Gittes.  
     CHINATOWN had as its roots the politics and business of water in
Los Angeles in the thirties.  THE TWO JAKES attempts to build itself
around the politics and business of oil in Los Angeles in the late
forties.  But oil does not permeate the atmosphere of the film in the
same way water did in CHINATOWN.  In that film, drought brought the
importance of water to the forefront.  The first film also used water
visually in a way that THE TWO JAKES fails to use oil.  Oil wells are
scattered all around, and everyone talks about how rich and important
oil men are, but the film does not demonstrate, in its plot or its
visuals, how oil was the lifeblood of Los Angeles in this period.
     THE TWO JAKES also fails to develop the atmosphere of CHINATOWN.
In CHINATOWN, corruption was present everywhere, a miasma-like precursor
to Los Angeles smog.  The entire city seemed entwined in a web of
venality and evil.  Shadowy lighting, moody music, eccentric characters,
and clever camera movement created a unique feel for the film.  THE TWO
JAKES is lacking that feel.  It isn't the same sort of film at all.
Vilmos Zgismond, the cinematographer, creates some very beautiful shots
reminiscent of the first film, but Nicholson the director does not show
the visual imagination that Roman Polanski brought to CHINATOWN.
Surprisingly, he doesn't have the vicious snap that Polanski did.
There's no moment in THE TWO JAKES that has the same punch as the scene
in CHINATOWN where the two hoods slashed Jake Gittes' nose.  That scene
showed the immediate nastiness of violence in  a way that dozens of
stunt men being jerked backwards by simulated gunshots does not, and
Polanski was able to use it to wake up the audience to the possibility
that bad things might really happen to people they cared about.
Nicholson provides no similar moment in THE TWO JAKES that makes dangers
real to the audience.
     One element Nicholson does try to reproduce is the careful pacing
of Polanski's film.  Polanski knows how to take his time, and paced
CHINATOWN very deliberately.  Nicholson clearly saw that Polanski did
this, but doesn't seem able to copy the style successfully.  Instead of
drawing the viewers in with a lazy seductiveness, the pacing of THE TWO
JAKES bores them.  Nicholson's best directorial moments in the film come
when he is going for an entirely different style, one that verges on the
surrealistic and slapstick.  It might be going too far to suggest that
THE TWO JAKES demonstrates that Nicholson can't direct, but he surely
can't imitate Roman Polanski very well.
     THE TWO JAKES does have some strengths.  As mentioned, Nicholson's 
performance is excellent as is the cinematography.  The period detail is
nicely presented, as well, giving the film a beautiful look.  The
supporting cast is filled with fine actors doing good work, though in
some cases they have far too little to work with.  Eli Wallach, Frederic
Forrest, and Richard Farnsworth simply don't have the screentime or
material to make a strong impression.  Meg Tilly provides her usual
strong performance, Harvey Keitel is good as the second Jake of the
title, and Ruben Blades does a nice turn as a gangster.  David Keith is
suitably vicious as a rotten cop, and Tom Waits has an unbilled scene as
the other half of Keith's Mutt and Jeff routine.  By and large, however,
the supporting roles seem underwritten, or at least underrepresented in
the finished film.  
     The overall failure of THE TWO JAKES is a pity, because, for once,
someone attempted a sequel that would expand and richen the themes of
the original film, and an original film that had serious intentions, at
that.  The only similar examples that spring to mind are THE GODFATHER
II (a definite success) and THE EXORCIST II (a stupendous failure).  THE
TWO JAKES is decidedly not a ripoff of CHINATOWN.  It has genuine
artistic intentions -- it's "about" something, and wants to reach
audiences in a way beyond the merely visceral.  From the title, to the
basic strings of the plot, to the characters and their motivations,
Nicholson and Towne want us to think and feel.  Among other things, THE
TWO JAKES is about love, loyalty, the inescapable influences of the
past, and redemption.  Unfortunately, the film just doesn't work.  While
far from a disaster, THE TWO JAKES is much too near a disappointment.

Title
Review for Stanley & Iris (1990)
     What is a "good script"?  Or, mirror image, what is a "bad script"?
Usually, when you hear someone say that a film has a bad script, what they
really mean is that the film is derivative, that the dialog is poor, that there
is no characterization, that it is predictable, that it fails to engage the
viewers.  Well, none of those things are true of STANLEY AND IRIS, yet it has a
bad script, or at least a fatally flawed one, and that's what makes it a fair
film, rather than a good film.
     STANLEY AND IRIS deals with the relationship of two middle-aged working
class people in a small Eastern city, certainly not a derivative situation.  
The dialog is true to character, sounds realistic, and even has a bit of poetry
to it.  The two principals are clearly defined, engaging characters, and some
of the supporting roles aren't too badly drawn.  While the major thrust of the
story follows lines that many other films have followed, the path to the
resolution is interesting and filled with nice twists.  And, to some extent, at
least, STANLEY AND IRIS does make us care about the lives of its major 
characters.  
     Where the script fails is in dramatic construction.  Writers Harriet
Frank, Jr., and Irving Ravetch have failed to provide a clear, relevant
sequence of events, each leading from one to the next, that tells a story.  In
STANLEY AND IRIS, while succeeding scenes clearly have some dramatic connection
to those that preceded, causality seems to be lacking.  For example, we
understand why, at one point, Stanley breaks off the relationship.  And we see
him begin it again.  But why?  The film shows us nothing that makes this change
understandable.  Perhaps we are meant to fill in the blanks by understanding
the destiny of the plot.  But the importance of these two people coming
together is never great enough for the viewer to do that much of the work
himself.  If this were the only lapse, the film might not have seemed so choppy
and arbitrary, but the whole movie is constructed that way.
     Which is a pity, because STANLEY AND IRIS is not a bad film.  Director
Martin Ritt stages each scene rather well.  As is his way, he also provides a
sense of authenticity to the setting.  As in SOUNDER and NORMA RAE, Ritt makes
us believe in the people and the life they lead by not allowing false heroics
or false tragedies, and by showing us generous slices of daily living that seem
familiar, comfortable, and correct.  
     The photography is also good.  It comes from a school of cinematography
that prizes the beauty of realism, so there are no fancy camera moves, the
lighting is naturalistic, and the shot selection is rather conservative,
suiting the subject matter.  But each shot is carefully considered and
attractively lit, making the New England city considerably more attractive than
it probably is in reality.
     The main attraction of STANLEY AND IRIS was always the casting of Robert
De Niro and Jane Fonda in the title roles.  Unfortunately, while each of them
does good work in isolation, and while there is no great clash between their
styles, they simply do not mesh on camera.  Their love is told to us, but the
performers fail to show it.  De Niro has never been especially good at 
expressing a nice, comfortable form of love.  Grand, destructive passion, yes,
but pleasant romantic love, no.  Fonda can, but it takes two to do this tango.
That major failing aside, the performances are quite good.  De Niro has made at
least one acting breakthrough here.  Unlike his character in FALLING IN LOVE,
Stanley is a fairly normal person who is likable and not dull.  Fonda manages
to submerge most of her glamour and charisma in a role that demands a certain
plainness of appearance and manner.  
     Other than these two, there are practically no important characters in the
film.  Martha Plimpton repeats her sullen, pregnant teenager role from
PARENTHOOD, with less material.  (Actually, I believe STANLEY AND IRIS was shot
first, so perhaps she repeated the role in PARENTHOOD, with more material.)
Swoozie Kurtz has a few angry moments as Fonda's sister, but disappears totally
from the latter half of the film.  Feodor Chaliapan, memorable in MOONSTRUCK,
has some nice moments as De Niro's father.
     STANLEY AND IRIS has received some major critical dumpings, which I think
weren't really justified.  It doesn't work, but it's not a crime against
cinema, either.  It's a fairly entertaining 100 minutes or so with some good,
professional work from all involved.  Many critics seemed to have seized upon
small points as a basis of their dislike of STANLEY AND IRIS, such as stating
that Jane Fonda's body was too shapely for the part, or that Stanley's
background made his problems seem unlikely.  But I think that these little
flaws are no more than symptoms of the overall failure of the script to
construct a logical, dramatic story.  If the pieces had all fallen into place
one by one, as they do in a good dramatic film, no one would have objected to
the small stuff.  As it is, STANLEY AND IRIS is a well-intentioned film that
can provide some pleasures, with only slight disappointment based on the
potentials of all the talents involved.

Title
Review for Killing Affair, A (1988)
The following review is of a film appearing at the recent AFI Film Festival
in Los Angeles.  I have no way of knowing whether the film reviewed will
appear at any normal theaters any time in the near future (or even at all).
     When one goes to a film festival, one expects to see films that normally
wouldn't show up anywhere else.  Some of them might be too unusual or different
for general release, either because of the filmmakers' idiosyncrasies or
because of deep cultural differences between the filmmakers and the audience.
Some might be overly ambitious failures.  Some might be masterpieces by unsung
geniuses.  Some might be godawful messes that were included for reasons beyond
the ken of all but the festival committee.  What one doesn't expect is mediocre
Hollywood filler.  Which is why A KILLING AFFAIR was so surprising when it
showed up at the AFI Festival.
     Basically, A KILLING AFFAIR is suspense film, with little to distinguish
it from any of the other 100 American suspense films released in the last year.
About the only interesting feature is that it's set in rural West Virginia
during World War II, but little in the story or characters arises from the time
or place, so the setting is no more than local color.  Otherwise, the film
unwinds in precisely the same way that all of its brethren do.
     The story concerns a woman who is alone in a secluded house, menaced by a
mysterious stranger.  Her husband, a womanizing cad, is away across the river,
and she doesn't know when he'll return.  The only neighbor, a mile away,
doesn't want to get involved.  The ferry is too far, and there aren't any boats
around.  So she must deal with the stranger by herself.  And, as the film
progresses, the role of the stranger becomes more complicated than a mere
boogeyman.  The setup lacks originality, but is a reasonable base for a
suspense story.  The execution, unfortunately, is totally ordinary.
     David Saperstein, who also wrote the film, shows a journeyman's talent in
his first directorial effort.  Everything hangs together reasonably well, the
camerawork isn't terrible, the pacing is acceptable, the acting satisfactory.
A KILLING AFFAIR gives the feeling of a director who relied too heavily on the
rest of the crew.  It looks like the cinematographer did pretty much what he
felt was right, the editor cut it his own way, the composer made all the
musical decisions, and the actors followed their own instincts, without anyone
exerting a unifying force on the film.  That is the director's task.
Saperstein seems to have stood back too far, allowing able professionals to
handle routine jobs, rather than convincing them that more than the routine was
demanded.
     Probably the strongest element of the film is Peter Weller's performance
as the mysterious stranger.  He demonstrates, as he did in FIRSTBORN and SHOOT
THE MOON, a fine ability to combine menace and attraction.  Unfortunately, the
script ultimately requires some pretty bizarre twists in the character, and,
while Weller tries hard, he's not quite able to pull them off.
     Kathy Baker, in the central role of the film, fails almost from her first
appearance.  While apparently an accomplished stage actress, she is unable to
find the key to making us care about her character.  We never sympathize with
her, or have a strong desire to see her removed from danger.  The character is
written weak, which made her task much harder.  This is the sort of role more
suitable for an established screen performer, as they can carry into the film a
history that makes us empathize with the characters they play.
     Saperstein's script is not well shaped.  Constrained by working from
someone else's novel, and apparently not a good one, Saperstein failed to solve
certain problems of the story.  Too many of the character's actions are
unmotivated, or stupid.  He also provides insufficient opportunities to develop
suspense.  Neither does he do much to convince us of the period or place of the
film.  The story could equally well be set anywhere, with little or no change
in dialog or plot.
     Cinematography (by Dominique Chapuis) and editing (by Patrick McMahon) are
professional and unengaged.  Any other of dozens of their compatriots could
have filled in for them, and produced exactly the same thing.  John Barry's
score is also more professional than exciting.
     A KILLING AFFAIR is destined for brief runs in theaters across the
country.  It will probably be opened regionally, and has already been shown in
some parts of the US.  While the film has nothing really wrong with it, it's
hard to recommend such a resolutely average effort.  I suppose that Peter
Weller fans might want to see it, but others need not worry about missing out
on anything.  If you absolutely have to see a movie, and it's this or FRIDAY
THE 13TH: PART VII, you would be much better off with A KILLING AFFAIR.  But,
then, that's not saying much.

Title
Review for Hol volt, hol nem volt (1987)
     A HUNGARIAN FAIRY TALE harkens back to those halcyon days of foreign film 
intellectualism, the 1960's, when no self-respecting intellectual would be 
found without an opinion on the latest Godard film, or a preference for either 
Fellini or Bergman.  Those were the days of really foreign foreign films, films
which challenged the intellect and amazed the eye.  They also had a certain 
heaviness, sometimes to the point of indigestibility.  At their best, they 
were bold and challenging.  At their worst, they were dull and pretentious.
     A HUNGARIAN FAIRY TALE is reminiscent of that sort of film, but
unfortunately, not in the best sense.  It's obscure, but not very deep.  It has
the requisite  level of difficulty and heaviness for a 60's European film, but
it isn't very  satisfying.  Director Gyula Gazdag has taken an interesting
premise, started  out on a cinematic journey, but then taken a dive into
shallow, but murky,  intellectual waters.  The resulting film has some fine
moments, but fails to  move or provoke.
     The premise of the film derives from a Gilbert and Sullivan-style
Hungarian law, still on the books.  All Hungarian children must have an
official father.   If no father is known, one is created.  Thus, some
illegitimate children have  fictional fathers, with fictional addresses and
occupations, on their birth  certificates.  Gazdag looks at such a child, and
examines what might happen if  he suddenly lost his mother before discovering
that his supposed father doesn't  exist at all.
     In some senses, this is a terrific premise.  I can easily imagine a fine
comedy, or suspense film, taking its starting point from here.  Taking the film
in one of these directions would not lead to much depth, but could  be fun.  On
the other hand, this premise could equally well serve as a jumping  off point
into a serious examination of the nature of reality, or into  totalitarian
suppression of truth, or into the roles of fathers and sons.  Or  one can
imagine a realistic social drama of a child on his own in a difficult  society.
     At first, this latter appears to be what Gazdag is up to.  But the
continued intercutting of the boy's plight with the activities of the clerk who
originally invented his father indicates that something more is going on.  This
clerk suddenly decides to destroy all of the records of children who he has
supplied fictitious fathers to.  We see a bit of the boy's story, told in a
fairly realistic manner, then some rather odd behavior from the clerk, then
we're  back to the boy.  Eventually the stories come together, and the movie
comes apart.  Gazdag suddenly breaks into surrealistic symbolism and confusing 
fantasy.
     Perhaps all of this symbolism and oddity makes sense to Hungarians.  It
made little sense to me.  Its only value seemed to be unpredicatability.
Surprises and twists are all well and good, but they work best when, in
retrospect, they make sense.  Those in A HUNGARIAN FAIRY TALE do not.  They
seem  arbitrary, suggesting a writer who didn't know how to end his script.  
     In many ways, A HUNGARIAN FAIRY TALE goes downhill.  The opening sequence 
features excellent photography, both technically and artistically.  The last 
shot is a standardly composed, poorly executed special effect.  The story-
telling is initially unusually elliptical, yet logical.  By the end, the 
method has become quite conventional, while at the same time displaying no 
logic worth mentioning.  The use of music from Mozart's THE MAGIC FLUTE early 
in the film is much more effective than its overuse at the end of the film.
     One element that remains strong throughout the film is the performance by
David Vermes as the boy.  Vermes had never been in a film before, but he 
delivers a strong performance.  As other writers have mentioned, he looks 
remarkably like a young, blond Marlon Brando, and he has some of the intensity 
of Brando, as well.  The other performances in the film are capable.
     One point in the film's favor, for me at least, is that it is in black and
white.  Black and white photography can achieve some remarkable effects, and
has a mood all its own, that even the best color photography cannot duplicate.
A HUNGARIAN FAIRY TALE has very fine photography, especially in the early part
of the film.  Cinematographer Elemer Ragalyi composes and lights shots
beautifully.  Unfortunately, by the end of the film his creativity was either
exhausted or suppressed.
     Gazdag has said, as have many other directors, that his films should speak
for themselves.  A HUNGARIAN FAIRY TALE mumbles, or perhaps speaks only
Hungarian.  In its more coherent moments, it has great beauty.  Its decline
into  incomprehensibility is thus all the more regrettable.

Title
Review for Sea of Love (1989)
     Throughout the history of film, great screen actors frequently appear in
films that really aren't worthy of them.  Bogart, Tracy, Garbo, Brando, anyone
you care to name, really, all appeared in films that not only were not great,
but clearly had no chance of being great from the word "go."  Their scripts
were unoriginal and average, their directors were not top-flight, sometimes the
production values weren't all that great.  But the classic film actors were
always able to make such films worth watching, despite the fact that the same
film made with a perfectly competent actor in the role would have been just
another piece of mediocrity.  Perhaps even more than their successes in strong
roles, great film actors can be defined by the interest they bring to lesser
roles.
     Al Pacino establishes that he is that kind of actor in SEA OF LOVE.  The
script, while acceptable, is only a bit above average, and of a genre we 
really see too much of today, the police thriller.  Director Harold Becker has
done a couple of good films, but none that stand far out from the pack.  The
entire film is reasonably well made, the supporting cast gives a couple of
strong performances, but, if it weren't for Pacino, this film would be
indistinguishable from any of a dozen other police thrillers released this
year.
     The script's central premise owes something to JAGGED EDGE -- instead of
an attorney falling for a client who may be guilty of murder, it's a cop
falling for a suspect who may be guilty of murder, with sexes reversed.  Pacino
plays a twenty-year man whose life is hollow and meaningless.  While
investigating the murder of a couple of men who had advertised in a singles
paper, he finds himself increasingly attracted to a woman who may have answered
their ads.  Is he really falling for a murderer?  His instincts are too
ambivalent to trust, evidence is present but weak, and he has so far lost track
of his center that he has no resources to fall back on.
     While not fully original, the central idea behind SEA OF LOVE has 
possibilities.  And having a woman as the suspect, rather than a man, adds 
another layer of complexity.  But the script does not play with the idea all
that well.  The central attraction of the story is a man who loves a woman so
much that he can't give her up, even though he spends half his time expecting
her to kill him.  But the film takes nearly an hour to introduce the woman, and
screenwriter Richard Price does not build up the suspense as well as he could 
have.  There are too few moments when the woman may suddenly pull out a gun and
blow the hero away.  
     However, Pacino takes over where Price leaves off.  Pacino is always best
as a  man under heavy pressure.  As Michael Corleone, Pacino contained the
pressure.   In DOG DAY AFTERNOON, he let it explode.  Here, he charts a middle
course,  trying to keep it in, but ultimately unable to hold it back.  While
not up to  the standard of these earlier performances, Pacino demonstrates that
he has  lost none of his fire.  Pacino also does a nice job of differentiating
this character from his previous parts -- this isn't just Michael Corleone as a
disillusioned cop, or Serpico as an alcoholic sellout.
     Pacino, fortunately, has the advantage of good co-stars to play off.
Ellen Barkin is a nice choice for the mystery woman.  Barkin's odd looks always
suggest more beneath the surface than what shows, and that is precisely the
quality that this part demands.  Price has not gone quite far enough in drawing
her character to make it completely successful, but Barking does a good job of
filling in the blanks.  John Goodman is strong in the only other major part  in
the film, Pacino's partner.  Oddly, his performance, good as it is, probably 
detracts more from the films intentions than it adds, since his basic good 
humor and niceness undercut the suspense.  By offering Pacino's character a 
mechanism to release some of the steam, Goodman also releases some of the 
film's tension.
     Price has not constructed his screenplay as well as he could have, but his
dialog is excellent, excepting only the final scene.  That scene lacks the snap
necessary to provide a satisfactory wrapup to the story.  If Price had any
really great lines saved up for a rainy day, this scene was the place to use
them.  This deficiency is partially compensated by a few sharp observations 
that Price manages to fit in around the edges of the story.  His plot plays the
police thriller game fairly, but is not sufficiently clever to stand out.
     Harold Becker proves to be a reasonable choice for the director.  He does
particularly well at capturing Pacino's performance.  He succeeds in providing 
a few tense moments, and keeps up the mood well.  Becker also does nicely in 
shading in some minor characters who were probably only vague suggestions in
the script.  On the whole, his direction is unobtrusive.  One can imagine that
Martin Scorsese or Sidney Lumet could have done much more, but Price does 
enough.  The technical credits also are fairly average.
     SEA OF LOVE is worth seeing, for those who like the genre or those who
like Pacino.  The various elements of the film are at least average, and
Pacino's  performance raises the overall effort to a higher level.  SEA OF LOVE
may never be remembered as a great film, but twenty years from now it's likely
to be regarded as a nice minor film of a great actor.

Title
Review for Dao ma zei (1986)
     Most films, even the excellent ones, fit squarely into an existing
tradition of cinema.  You have seen the same sort of thing before, even though
the approach and many aspects of the film are novel.  Once in a great while,
more often for adventurous movie-goers than for those who see only Hollywood
films, you come across something that is really new and different.  Even less
often, it is new, different, and good.  Such a film is like a revelation.  The
first Bergman movie one sees, or the first Tarkovsky, or the first Fellini, can
be this sort of experience, a sudden broadening of one's private definition of
what film is.  For me, HORSE THIEF is such an experience.
     I have seen new Chinese films before, three or four of them, and, while
they were largely good films, they were rather conventional.  Typically, they
seemed to combine filmmaking techniques from the classic Hollywood era with
some of the less innovative elements of Japanese cinema, filtered through a
residual layer of Communist/socialist political thought.  (Though the political
content has apparently decreased dramatically in the last decade.)  HORSE
THIEF is something entirely different.  Nothing in the film suggests leftovers
from the 1930's, or borrowed aesthetics, or Communist propaganda.  Vital,
stunning originality is its mark.
     The story is set in Tibet in the 1920's, though it might as well be the
16th century, for all the effect that the modern age has on the area.  A poor
man must steal horses to support his wife and young, adored son.  Despite his
disreputable occupation, he piously contributes the bulk of his spoils to the
temple.  From this simple situation, a very minimal plot propels the film.  But
HORSE THIEF is not a film to watch for plot.  Rather, the film presents a slow,
careful revelation of the difficult lives of Tibetans, with emphasis on the
vital role of religion in their lives.
     Practically every action taken by anyone in HORSE THIEF is directly
related either to survival or religion.  The land is harsh, and only constant
effort permits people to live there.  The characters only take time away from
this struggle to worship their god.  Gradually, as one watches the film, one
realizes that the constant attention to worship is an intimate part of
survival.  Life is so hard that only sacred intervention can save the
characters from death.  Every turn of the prayer wheel, every ceremonial dance,
every sacrifice and devotion has the practical aim of supplicating for the
divine intervention that alone can ensure survival.  The greatest disasters of
the film stem from unluckily angering the deity.  One of the most surprising
things about this film from the People's Republic of China is that the
peasants' attitudes about religion are taken completely at face value.  Perhaps
Buddha does not exist, and does not intervene in the daily lives of Tibetans,
but HORSE THIEF offers no evidence that he doesn't, and seems to suggest that
he does.
     But even the unexpected theme of  HORSE THIEF does not capture the
importance of this film.  The photography and direction are the film's most
innovative aspects.  Tian Zhuangzhuang, the director, has a unique visual
style,  favoring long, static shots.  The typical presentation of long scenes
in most movies is to break the scene into several shots, each taken from a
different angle, at a different distance from the subject.  Often, the only
reason for breaking up the scene is visual interest.  The director fears that
we will be bored by a single, static shot covering several minutes, so he
jazzes the scene up.  Taken to the extreme,  this approach yields MTV-style
films, in which no shot lingers more than a few seconds - editing as rock and
roll.  Only daring directors will let their camera be still, and then only on
the most interesting subjects, as a calculated effect.
     Tian takes a vastly different approach.  He treats the camera as a distant
viewer, almost godlike in its unblinking perspective.  A shot will last for
several minutes, with the action taking place far beyond the foreground.
Camera movement is mostly used to quietly, slowly follow a moving subject, and
cutting within a scene is rare.  But Tian is not indulging in cinematic
primitivism.  For one thing, the photography is ravishingly beautiful,
capturing the awesome splendor of Tibet and the rich colors of its culture.
More tellingly, several sequences show that Tian is intimately familiar with
more complex uses of the camera.  His sparing use of movement and editing
allows him to extract tremendous impact from the same devices that other
directors use routinely.  A sudden, split-second cut registers surprise and
shock as it never could in a typical film.  A montage of overlaid images
beautifully suggests a blurring of the lines between the everyday and the
mystical.  A tracking shot following two characters as they walk in circles
around a building meshes beautifully with an old woman's use of a prayer wheel
throughout the scene.
     If HORSE THIEF is reminiscent of any other film, it must be 2001: A SPACE
ODYSSEY.  That film, too, made great use of lengthy shots, deliberate pacing,
and exquisitely calculated technical flashes.  The masterful use of wide screen
is also a common element between the films.  But Kubrick, either intentionally
or accidentally, was forced to sacrifice all humanity from his film.  His
characters were largely flat and lifeless.  The characters in HORSE THIEF are
vitally real, with none of their humanity drained by the distant perspective of
the camera.
     HORSE THIEF is decidedly not a film for everyone.  It moves slowly, the
plot is simple, and the director demands effort from the viewer.  Everything
you need to know is shown, or told, but the viewer must pay attention to the
film, for nothing will be repeated solely for clarity.   Tian  cares less about
explaining to the inattentive than he does about achieving his vision.  For
serious lovers of film, HORSE THIEF must not be missed, and must be seen on a
movie screen.  (A videocassette could not possible capture the magic of this
film, and, on a purely mundane level, would chop off the vital edges of the
widescreen images.)  I would not be surprised if, a year from now, I considered
HORSE THIEF to be the best film I saw in 1989.

Title
Review for Little Nikita (1988)
     One of the most frustrating experiences one is likely to have in a movie
theater is to watch a good premise be ruined.  Of all the films that get made
in Hollywood (or anywhere else, for that matter), relatively few are based on
an idea that's worth mentioning.  Most are rehashings of films past --
sometimes well done, more often not.  So when someone comes up with an idea
that isn't totally familiar, you get your expectations up.  If they're
disappointed, you feel worse about the film than if it had been another rehash
of the same old junk.
     LITTLE NIKITA is a good case in point.  The theme of the film is rich in
possibilities: a typical American kid finds out that his parents are actually
Soviet agents.  A good writer could take this premise in a lot of interesting
directions.  We could see the film through the eyes of the kid, concentrating
on his world coming down around him.  It could be a mystery in which you aren't
sure till the last minute whether or not the parents really are the agents.
You could present the film from the point of view of the authorities tracking
the enemy agents.  You could even work from the point of view of the parents.
But the most critical point is that you have to have a point of view, and that
is precisely what LITTLE NIKITA lacks.  The film never decides whose story is
being told here, so it rapidly and repeatedly shifts gears.  The result is that
it never settles into any rhythm, and there is no consistent tone.  We never
find out whose story this is.
     If lack of focus were LITTLE NIKITA's only problem, it might have been a
flawed, but interesting, film.  Unfortunately, its problems are legion.
Richard Benjamin, who actually made a couple of good films early in his
directing career, is utterly incompetent here.  There is no suspense, no
tension, no consistency even of style.  He utterly botches the film's climax,
which doesn't make much sense anyway.  Cinematographer Laszlo Kovacs shoots 
what Benjamin asked him to well, but often the choice of what to shoot was 
badly mistaken.
     Also, beyond problems in viewpoint, the script is a mess.  The dialog is
either poor or pointless.  The plot makes little or no sense.  The characters
are dully constructed of cardboard.  Several writers, including Bo Goldman, one
of the most respected screenwriters in Hollywood, worked on this script.  All I
can guess is that they each threw some parts of the script out, and the
producers mistakenly got hold of all the rejected material and pasted it
together into the final form.  As presented on the screen, the script is
unbelievably amateurish and flimsy.
     The acting does little to help.  Sidney Poitier showed why he had been a
major star in SHOOT TO KILL.  Here, he shows why he retired.  Poitier 
flounders in the rotten part of an FBI agent trying to capture a renegade 
Soviet agent.  One moment he's the dedicated cop, the next he's playful and 
lighthearted.  He can't seem to decide whether he's doing IN THE HEAT OF THE
NIGHT or UPTOWN SATURDAY NIGHT.  Poitier plays each scene as if he had never
seen any other scene in the script, including those that were chronologically 
earlier.  Poitier is lucky that SHOOT TO KILL came out before LITTLE NIKITA, as
the earlier success will likely cause people to forget this fiasco.
     River Phoenix has nothing worthwhile to contribute to the part of the boy.
Of course, the script gives him little to work with, and Phoenix has been very
good in better parts, so his flounderings can probably be blamed mostly on
writing and direction.  Richard Bradford plays a Soviet agent as if he were
giving examples of overused spy cliches.  Richard Lynch, as the renegade, adds
yet another indistinguishable sadist part to his credits.  No real motivation
is given for his character, so he can probably be forgiven for repeated what
he's done often before.  None of the other cast members does anything worthy of
mention.
     LITTLE NIKITA could have been so much more than it is.  The realities of
Hollywood probably would have prevented it from being anything other than an
action/suspense movie, but it could have been a good one.  (Just imagine what
Alfred Hitchcock would have done with it.)  Instead, LITTLE NIKITA is a waste
of a couple of talented actors and an excellent idea.  It is utterly 
forgettable.
